Trains
London to Manchester
London to Brighton train
Glasgow to London train
London to Edinburgh train
London to Liverpool train
London to Paris train
Copenhagen to Stockholm train
Madrid to Barcelona train
Boston to New York train
New York City to Philadelphia train
Featured Destinations
Avanti West Coast
South Western Railway
LNER
Northern Rail
Great Western Railway
Eurostar
Renfe
Deutsche Bahn
SNCF
Chiltern Railways
Coaches
London to Paris coach
London to Prague bus
London to Stansted coach
London to Manchester coach
London to Liverpool coach
Bristol to London coach
London to Calais bus
Bilbao to San Sebastian bus
London to Amsterdam coach
Featured Destinations
National Express
FlixBus
BlaBlacar Bus
Alsa
Ecolines
Academy
RedCoach
Lux Express
RegioJet
Avanza
Megabus
Flights
London to Paris flight
London to Gibraltar flight
London to Benidorm flight
Amsterdam to London flight
Valencia to Lisbon flight
Paris to Barcelona flight
Rome to Paris flight
Milan to Paris flight
Paris to Venice flight
Featured Destinations
Aer Lingus
KLM
British Airways
Ryanair
easyJet
Vueling Airlines
Eurowings
SWISS
Wizz Air
Iberia
Ferries
Dover to Dunkirk
Dunkirk to Dover
Holyhead to Dublin ferry
Dover to Calais ferry
Liverpool to Belfast ferry
Belfast to Blackpool ferry
Norwich to Amsterdam ferry
Santorini to Athens ferry
Naples to Palermo ferry
Ibiza to Barcelona ferry
Sorrento to Positano ferry
Naples to Sorrento ferry
Calais to Dover ferry
Supetar to Split ferry
Stockholm to Helsinki ferry
Featured Destinations
Seajets
SNAV
Blue Star Ferries
Moby Lines
NLG
£
[menuItemContent]
[menuItemRightSideContent]
[menuItemContent]
[menuItemRightSideContent]
Your bookings
Sign in
Privacy Policy
Last updated: 27.05.2024
Omio Corp., a Delaware corporation with its operational headquarters located at Warschauer Platz 12,
                10245 Berlin, Germany, together with its subsidiaries and corporate affiliates (“we,” “us,” “our,” or
                “Omio”) respect your right to privacy and we take our responsibility to safeguard your
                private information very seriously. Omio Corp. is the operator of the Omio websites
                (collectively, our “Service Sites”) and the Omio mobile applications (collectively, the
                “App”), is the data ‘controller,’ as defined by the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”). You can
                contact us at
info@omio.com
and our data protection officer at
privacy@omio.com
. If the Service Sites or the App connect you
                with third-party online services, you should carefully review the privacy policies of such third-party
                sites as they are not governed by our privacy policy.
We want to inform you about the way we collect and process your personal data in accordance with the GDPR
                and the German Federal Data Protection Act (BDSG).
I. What kind of data do we collect?
1. Automatically generated website visitor information
We collect information and data that is automatically transmitted or generated by your browser each time
                you visit our website. Such information includes the IP address, the URLs of the site you visited before
                accessing our Service Sites (“referrer”), the browser used, the browser language, the operating system
                and user interface, the access device used, date and time of your access, the pages viewed on our
                website, and the time you spend on the Service Sites. Such data is stored for a period of two years and
                deleted automatically thereafter. We may use this information to investigate errors, to improve the
                stability and functionality of the Service Sites and the App, and to assist you in completing any
                interrupted bookings.
2. Data provided by you / user accounts
Furthermore, we also collect and use the information you provide to us about yourself, your travel
                companions, and about the planning of your trip by using the Service Sites or the App:
a) When you book a travel product through our Service Sites, we ask you to provide personal data, e.g.
                your name, your email address, phone number, government-issued identification numbers, emergency contact
                information, billing address, payment method or credit card information, your preferred travel
                connection and – where applicable – information about your loyalty, bonus or discount cards (e.g.
                mileage or frequent-flyer programs, railway customer cards). We will ask you for the data that the
                respective transportation provider requires to complete the booking process. Our forms show what kind of
                data is required for each respective booking. We cannot process your booking without provision of the
                required data. Credit card information will be immediately passed on to the respective payment provider.
                We only store truncated credit card data (e.g. “511111******1111”) for reporting purposes and fraud
                analysis. When you make a booking for someone else (e.g. your travel companion, business travel) through
                the Service Sites or the App, we will request personal information about such companion or such
                business. You should obtain the consent of all such individuals before providing their information to us
                as those individuals may not be able to independently view their information themselves if it is
                provided to us under your account. To the extent that your companion(s) may need to amend or delete
                their information, they can reach out to us using
privacy@omio.com
.
b) Should you opt to additionally register for a personal profile with Omio by creating a user account,
                this data will be stored with us for your future bookings.
c) If you contact us or our customer support (e.g. by email, telephone or contact form on the Service
                Sites), we use the data you provided (usually your contact information and your inquiry) to respond.
d) Call recording: When you make calls to our customer service team, you may be required to confirm that
                you have an existing reservation with us. Calls to our customer service team may be recorded for quality
                control and training purposes, which includes using the recordings to process claims and for fraud
                detection purposes. . You can opt-out from the call recording at any time during your conversation with
                our customer service team by notifying one of our agents.
e) We may invite you to take part in surveys from time to time. These surveys may help us conduct market
                research, analyze how to improve your experience on the Service Sites and the App, and improve the
                functionality and quality of our Products. We will collect the data provided by you when you submit any
                such survey responses.
We will retain Personal Data collected from you for as long as we have an existing legitimate business
                need to do so (such as the purposes set out in paragraphs a) to e) above). In some cases, We may retain
                your Personal Data for longer periods, in order to comply with statutory obligations. These include
                fraud investigations, tax and accounting obligations, or other legal purposes in line with applicable
                laws.
We determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data based on the following;
The purpose for which we process the Personal Data,
The nature, and sensitivity of your Personal Data processed,
The potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Data, and
Any applicable legal requirements (such as statutes of limitation).
Once the legitimate business purpose or legal obligation no longer exists, We will either delete or
                anonymize your personal data.
In addition, We’d like to remind You that You have rights in relation to Your Personal Data under the EU
                General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). These include the right to be forgotten, the right to access
                Your Personal Data, the right to data portability, amongst others. You can exercise these rights at any
                time, subject to statutory legal obligations We may be subject to, by contacting our Data Protection
                Team at
privacy@omio.com
.
Furthermore, If you object to our data processing set out under this section, and no opt-out mechanism is
                available to you directly (for instance in your account settings), please send your objection to our
                Data Protection Team at
privacy@omio.com
.
Bookings for certain countries may be handled by our partner Amadeus IT Group SA (Salvador de Madariaga
                1, Madrid, 28027, Spain) and its affiliates. For such bookings, we may transmit your booking data to
                Amadeus, which processes the data under its own responsibility according to their data protection policy
                which we highly recommend you to carefully review on their website before making any such booking (see
                link
here
).
The Service Sites and App are intended to be used by adults only. We do not knowingly collect personal
                information from children under the age of 13. In the event that we have knowledge that a child under
                the age of 13 has submitted any personal information to us via the Services Sites or the App, we may use
                the email address or other contact information provided by the child for the sole purpose of responding
                to the child’s question or carrying out his or her request on a one-time-only basis. We will not use the
                email address provided by such child for any other purpose, and we will delete such information from our
                records once their question has been answered or the request has been fulfilled. If we become aware that
                we have unknowingly collected personal contact information other than an email address from a child
                under the age of 13, we will delete the information immediately.
3. Logging in with Facebook Connect
It may also be possible to log into our Service Sites using Facebook Connect. Doing so will not require
                you to register a separate user account with us. Instead, you may log in using your existing Facebook
                account. In the process, Facebook transmits certain pieces of your personal data to us. Facebook will
                inform you, during such registration process, about the data to be transmitted (“Facebook Data”). You
                will be given the explicit opportunity to consent or to refuse to the transmission of such Facebook
                Data. Facebook will not transmit any of your personal Facebook Data to us without your express
                permission. We will then be able to see your Facebook username and your public Facebook profile. We may
                use this Facebook Data solely for the purposes detailed in this privacy policy, or for purposes that we
                explain to you at the time we collect your personal information. Conversely, Facebook will be able to
                see whether and when you log into our site using Facebook Connect.
You can stop using Facebook Connect login to the Service Sites at any time and, if desired, create your
                own user profile account with us. Note that you can opt to use our Service Sites without creating a user
                account at all.
4. Newsletter and marketing emails
If you opt into our newsletter subscription (e.g. by subscribing via the Service Sites or when creating a
                user account), we will send you newsletters and marketing emails, including information about Omio,
                together with promotions for offers and services whether provided by us or third-parties (e.g. travel,
                accommodation).
If you have opted to receive our newsletter subscription, you can withdraw your consent by using the
                “unsubscribe” link included in each of our newsletter and marketing emails.
Upon the withdrawal of your consent or unsubscribing from the newsletter, we delete your contact
                information, unless the contact information remains stored for another reason described elsewhere in
                this privacy policy, such as part of your user account or in relation to your bookings, as described
                above.
5. Cookies, web beacons and similar technology
Like most other website operators, we use cookies, web beacons, and similar technology (collectively
                “Tracking Facilities”) when you visit or use our Service Sites.
Cookies are small text files that are stored by your browser on your computer or mobile device and which
                allow re-identification of your computer or mobile device, potentially across numerous websites,
                including the Service Sites. These cookies contain no personal data. Some of the cookies we use are
                automatically deleted upon expiry of your session, that is, when you close your browser (these are
                referred to as session cookies). Other cookies remain stored on your device and allow us, or our
                business partners, to recognize your browser during subsequent visits (persistent cookies).
Our use of Tracking Facilities allows us to collect information about our users in order to provide
                simpler and more convenient access to our Service Sites, or to enable us to provide certain services at
                all.
We use Tracking Facilities for the following purposes:
To save your user settings such as language and currency while on using the Service Sites, and
                    between visits.
To store your login status as a registered user (optional), so you do not have to log in again when
                    returning to the Service Sites later.
For the technical assignment of your visit to certain servers to ensure a safe transition between
                    pages and search queries.
To monitor the performance of our systems (no user-based evaluation of data).
Service providers for website analysis, retargeting, and conversion tracking may also use Tracking
                    Facilities (see below).
If you click a link on the Service Sites that takes you to the website of a provider (for example when
                making a booking or to buy a ticket), it is possible that such other websites also store cookies on your
                computer. We have no control over these providers’ cookies and the data collected in this way and we
                cannot accept any responsibility for our providers’ websites or their tracking practices. We encourage
                you to carefully review the privacy policies of any website that you visit.
How do we use cookies?
We use different categories of cookies for different purposes (see below)
Mandatory for Use: We use strictly necessary cookies that are essential for You to browse the website
                properly and use its core features. As such they do not require Your consent. These cookies will
                generally be first-party cookies.
Category: Infrastructure
Purpose: Infrastructure cookies are first-party cookies that are necessary for you to browse the website
                properly and use its core features. They are essential for Us to provide You with the services You
                expect, such as using our platform to search and book travel services.
Category: Security
Purpose: Security cookies are necessary to ensure an adequate level of security of our website such as
                user authentication for secure payment and fraud prevention. These may include third-party cookies, e.g.
                security cookies from the payment provider You selected when You are redirected to the payment page.
Category: Functionalities
Purpose: Core functionality cookies are necessary to ensure the proper functioning of our website and its
                essential features, such as travel service bookings and ticket issuance. These may include third-party
                cookies from our transportation providers when you are redirected to their website to finalize your
                booking.
Non-necessary cookies: We also use cookies and similar technologies that help us understand how you use
                our website and to improve your user experience. As such they may include third-party cookies for
                marketing and personalization purposes. These cookies will be stored in your browser only with your
                consent. You can choose to reject such cookies under
"Settings"
, which might affect your experience with our
                website.
Category: Performance and Statistics
Purpose: Performance & Statistics cookies are used to help understand personal and statistical use of our
                website to improve your user experience. As such they may include third-party cookies and similar
                technologies like analytics services. It allows us to gain important insights about the use of our
                websites and how different settings affect your user experience.
Category: Marketing
Purpose: Marketing cookies are used to assist our marketing efforts and improve online advertising
                performance. They allow us to track your online activity in order to place personalized and relevant
                advertisements from third-party Ads partners. We may upload your user identifiers received from these
                cookies to our Ads partner platform such as Facebook, Google and others to help improve the
                personalization
                of the advertisements.
6. Retargeting
Our Service Sites may use what are known as retargeting tags for presentation of interest-related
                advertising on third-party websites.
A retargeting tag is the name for a JavaScript element that is placed in our Service Site’s source code.
                If you visit a page on our Service Site that contains a retargeting tag, a provider of online
                advertising services (each a “Retargeting Provider”, e.g. Google, Facebook, etc.) places a cookie on
                your computer and allocates it to the corresponding retargeting target group lists. The Retargeting
                Provider uses the cookie to gather data related to your interests (e.g. the pages visited on the Service
                Sites or search queries), using pseudonymous identifies. Based on that information, the Retargeting
                Provider displays interest-based ads on third-party websites. No directly personally identifying data is
                stored or transmitted, and the usage profiles will not be merged with your personal data. However, the
                Retargeting Provider can potentially identify you and track your visits on our website, in particular,
                if you are a registered user of the particular Retargeting Provider (e.g. if you have a Google or
                Facebook account).
We use the following Retargeting Providers:
To learn more about this type of targeted advertising and your options for preventing it, follow this
                link:
youronlinechoices.com
If you are a resident in Canada, you can follow this link:
https://youradchoices.ca/
You can object to usage-based online advertising by all or some providers on the same website. To access
                the preferences manager, click here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.com/de/praferenzmanagement
If you are a resident in Canada, you can click here:
http://optout.aboutads.info/?c=3&lang=en
You can also prevent data transfer to all retargeting providers by Omio at any time by clicking the
                following link:
You opted out of tracking for advertising purposes. Click below to change that:
Allow tracking for advertising
                            purposes
Don't
                        track me for advertising purposes
If you click the link above, we will set a persistent cookie that allows us to recognize and observe your
                opt-out upon later visits to the Service Sites. Please note that it must be re-set when you delete all
                cookies in your browser. Opt-out cookies prevent tracking when you visit the Service Sites with a
                specific device, browser and domain. To prevent cookies on different devices or browsers, you must set
                the opt-out cookie by clicking the opt-out button on all devices/browsers. The same applies if you visit
                the Service Sites under different top-level domains (e.g. omio.com or omio.it).
                To prevent tracking in the App, please use the App’s opt-out function (see below).
7. Conversion tracking
We use advertising partners to advertise our offers on third-party websites. We also use marketing tools
                to determine the success of our advertising measures (“Conversion Tracking”). We intend to show you
                advertising relevant to your interests, to optimize our website, and to achieve a fair calculation of
                advertising costs.
To that end our advertising partners use cookies and web beacons (see above) to measure certain
                parameters related to the success of an advertising campaign, e.g. display of an ad or user clicks. The
                cookies are not intended to personally identify you. For the lifetime of the cookie the advertising
                partner can identify your clicks on an ad and your redirection to a certain landing page (e.g. form
                input, confirmation page, newsletter subscription). Based on this information, the advertising partner
                generates conversion statistics. These statistics show e.g. the number of users that have clicked on one
                of our ads. In addition, the statistics show the number of users that have reached a certain target page
                that has been marked with a “conversion tag” (remarketing tag, see above). The statistics do not include
                data that allows us to personally identify you.
We do not collect or use personal data in the advertising campaigns ourselves. Our advertising partners
                only provide us with statistical data, which allows us to identify effective advertising campaigns. We
                do not receive additional data, in particular no data that would allow us to identify our users.
Due to the Conversion Tracking tools, your browser automatically connects to the server of the
                advertising partners. We have no influence on the scope and further use of data collected by the
                Conversion Tracking tools of our advertising partners. The advertising partners receive the information
                that you have visited certain pages on the Service Sites or clicked on one of our ads. If you are a
                registered user of the advertising partner (e.g. if you have a Google or Facebook account), the
                advertising partner can relate your visits to such account data. Even if you are not a registered user
                with the advertising partner, or are not logged into your account, the advertising partner may collect
                and store your IP address.
We use Conversion Tracking with the following advertising partners:
To learn more about this type of targeted advertising and your options for preventing it, follow this
                link:
youronlinechoices.com
If you are a resident in Canada, you can follow this link:
https://youradchoices.ca/
You can object to usage-based online advertising by all or some providers on the same website. To access
                the preferences manager, click here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.com/de/praferenzmanagement
If you are a resident in Canada, you can follow this link:
http://optout.aboutads.info/?c=3&lang=en
You can also prevent data transfer to all retargeting providers by Omio at any time by clicking the
                following link:
You opted out of tracking for advertising purposes. Click below to change that:
Allow tracking for advertising
                            purposes
Don't
                        track me for advertising purposes
If you click the link above, we will set a persistent cookie that allows us to recognize and observe your
                opt-out upon later visits to the Service Sites. Please note that it must be re-set when you delete all
                cookies in your browser. Opt-out cookies prevent tracking when you visit our website with a specific
                device, browser and domain. To prevent cookies on different devices or browsers, you must set the
                opt-out cookie by clicking the opt-out button on all devices/browsers. The same applies if you visit our
                website under different top-level domains (e.g. omio.com or omio.it). To
                prevent tracking in the App, please use the App’s opt-out function (see below).
8. Web analytics and statistics / Google Analytics
The Service Sites use Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google LLC. (“Google”).
                Google uses cookies (see above), which are stored on the user's computer and allow us to analyze the use
                of the Service Sites. The information generated by the cookie about the use, including the user’s
                current, but truncated EU IP addresses are transmitted to a Google server in the USA and stored there.
                Since we have activated IP anonymization, your IP address will be truncated by Google within a European
                Union member state or a member state of the European Economic Area before transmission to the USA. Only
                in exceptional circumstances will the full IP address be transferred from the EU and truncated in the
                USA. Google will use this information on our behalf to evaluate the use of the Service Sites, compiling
                reports on the activities of users of our services, and to provide other services associated with
                internet use. In addition, Google may also transfer this information to third-parties if required to do
                so by law or where such third-parties process the information on Google's behalf. The IP address sent by
                your browser to Google Analytics will not be merged with other Google data.
You can prevent the installation of cookies by changing the settings of your browser. Please note,
                however, that this may prevent some of our services’ feature from working correctly. Alternatively, you
                can prevent the collection of cookie data and your website usage data (including your IP address) by
                Google and the processing of such data by Google by downloading and installing a browser plugin
                available at:
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
In addition, you can disable data processing by Google Analytics by clicking on the following link:
Deactivate Google Analytics
This sets an opt-out cookie that prevents the future collection of your data when visiting the Service
                Sites. Please note that it must be reset when you delete all cookies in your browser.
This website utilizes Google Analytics with the extension “_anonymizeIP()”. This extension ensures the
                processing of truncated IP addresses, so that no direct personal identification via IP addresses is
                possible.
Personal data associated with cookies, user identifiers (e.g., User-ID) and advertising identifiers
                (e.g., DoubleClick cookies, Android’s Advertising ID, Apple’s Identifier for Advertisers) will be
                deleted automatically after 14 months.
Use of Google Analytics is in accordance with the requirements agreed between the German data protection
                authorities and Google. Please find additional information here: Google Dublin, Google Ireland Ltd.,
                Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland, Fax: +353 (1) 436 1001.
Usage terms:
http://www.google.com/analytics/terms/de.html
,
Privacy information:
http://www.google.com/intl/de/analytics/learn/privacy.html
,
Privacy policy:
https://business.safety.google/privacy/
.
Google has incorporated the EU Standard Contractual Clauses,
https://policies.google.com/privacy/frameworks?hl=en-US
.
9. Social Plugins
The Service Sites use what are referred to as social plugins by the following social media providers:
We use the so-called 2-click solution. If you visit the Service Sites, no personal data is transferred to
                the plugin provider. You can recognize the plugin provider by the label or logo on the button. We permit
                you to communicate directly with the plugin provider via the button.
Only if you click the button and activate the plugin, the plugin provider receives the information that
                you have visited the respective page of the Service Sites. In addition, the information mentioned under
                Sec. 1 above is transferred by your browser to the plugin provider. If you have an account with the
                plugin provider, and are logged in, the provider may relate your visit to the Service Sites and your
                additional interaction with the social plugin (e.g. clicking on the “Like” button) to your user account
                (e.g. your Facebook account).
We have no influence on the data collected and processed by the plugin provider, nor do we know the full
                extent of the data processing, purposes, retention terms and deletion of data by the plugin provider.
                Please find additional information regarding data processing by the plugin provider in their respective
                privacy policies linked above. These policies also include information regarding your rights and
                privacy-related configuration options.
10. Data Breaches
In the unlikely event of any unauthorized access or acquisition of your personal data, or if we
                experience a breach of security leading to the accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration,
                unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, your personal data, where such breach poses a significant risk
                of harm to your rights and freedoms, we will promptly notify you without undue delay and, where
                feasible, not later than 72 hours after having become aware of it. In such case, we will also inform
                governmental authorities of such breach as required by applicable law.
II. Omio app
The Omio applications (collectively referred to as the “App”) are alternative ways to access
                offers and services provided by Omio. The App records, processes and utilizes data in the same way as
                the Service Sites, for the same purposes and on the same legal basis. The contents of this portion of
                the privacy policy apply to the App.
1. Additional use of app-specific data
When using the App, Omio can access additional data relating to the App and your mobile device, e.g.
                the device name, device manufacturer, model, operating system version, app version or SDK version and
                the device number (IMEI), advertising identifiers (e.g. Android’s Advertising ID, Apple’s Identifier for
                Advertisers). If you are using an Android device, the App can also detect what Google services you have
                subscribed to and can prevent your device from going into standby while the App is running.
The App, for both Android and iOS, requires your permission in order to function properly. Once you grant
                such permission, the App may record your device’s geolocation to use it for processing your query (e.g.,
                filling in your location in the search form, to provide location-based services, or to suggest relevant
                content based on your location). Your location data is transmitted through an encrypted connection. If
                you use GPS, the App will detect your precise location. The data is used to fill in the search form and
                will not be stored otherwise. You may use your device’s settings menu to disable location data
                collection at any time.
2. Statistics and analytics
We use data analytics services to create statistics and analytics regarding your use of the App, the
                Service Sites, and our services. Data analytics services also assist when transitioning to our partner’s
                websites or services. We use the IP address and device identifier of your mobile device for such
                purposes. In addition, we may use such information to create cross-device, pseudonymous usage profiles
                (“cross-device-tracking”). You can disable the analytics functionality at any time in the App
                preferences.
In our apps, we use "Google Analytics" and “Firebase Analytics” as analytics services provided by Google
                LLC. (“Google”). Google provides SDKs (software development kits), which are stored on the user's device
                and allow us to analyze their use of the App. The information generated by the SDKs about such use,
                including the user’s current, but truncated IP address, are transmitted to a Google server in the USA
                and stored there. Since we have activated IP anonymization, your IP address, if collected in the EU,
                will be truncated by Google within a European Union member state or a member state of the European
                Economic Area before transmission to the USA. Only in exceptional circumstances will the full IP address
                be transferred and truncated in the USA. Google will use this information on our behalf to evaluate the
                use of the App, compile reports on the activities of users of our services, and to provide other
                services associated with internet use. In addition, Google may also transfer this information to
                third-parties if required to do so by law or where such third-parties process the information on
                Google's behalf. The IP address sent by your App to Google Analytics or Firebase will not be merged with
                other Google data.
If you are using the App, you can disable data processing by Google Analytics or by Firebase by using the
                switch at the bottom of this page.
This app utilizes Google Analytics with the extension “_anonymizeIP()”. This ensures processing of
                truncated IP addresses, so that no direct personal identification via IP addresses is possible.
Please find additional information regarding Google Analytics here:
Usage terms:
http://www.google.com/analytics/terms/de.html
,
Privacy information:
http://www.google.com/intl/de/analytics/learn/privacy.html
,
Privacy policy:
https://business.safety.google/privacy/
Google has incorporated the EU Standard Contractual Clauses
https://policies.google.com/privacy/frameworks?hl=en-US
3. Push messages
If you have configured your mobile device accordingly, the App may send you push messages, e.g. to
                provide updates on Omio, status updates, marketing campaigns and other news, or to notify you of new
                services, products, and features. Push messages may also include advertising for Omio or
                third-party offers (e.g. travel, accommodation).
You can withdraw your consent to receive marketing push messages at any time, free of charge, by
                disabling marketing push messages in the App settings or by deactivating push messages in your device’s
                operating system preferences.
We use Braze (114 Sansome St Suite 1200, San Francisco, CA 9410) to send newsletters and push
                notifications based on your searches. You can find more information regarding data processing by Braze
                and your rights and options regarding protecting your personal data here:
https://www.braze.com/privacy/
4. Retargeting
You can find more information about retargeting above (Sec. I.6).
We use the following retargeting and attribution providers:
Provider
Contact
Further information
Adjust
adjust Inc. 500 Montgomery Street, Suite A, San Francisco, CA 94111, USA
Your Adjust ID (a unique identifier) and the routes you have searched for will be sent
                                to Adjust (an attribution tool). These are solely used for pseudonymous analytics and
                                are not related to a natural person. You can find additional information regarding data
                                processing by Adjust and your rights and options with regard to protecting your personal
                                data here:
https://www.adjust.com/privacy-policy/
Liftoff Mobile, Inc
555 Bryant Street, Suite 133, Palo Alto, CA 94301, USA
Collects anonymous information when you interact with the app for the purpose of
                                optimization of our marketing measures (conversion optimization).
Criteo SA
32,Rue Blanche, 75009 Paris
Click Tech Limited (Yeahmobi)
Room 1907, 19/F, Lee Garden One, 33 Hysan Av, Causeway Bay, Hong Kong
Collects anonymous information when you interact with the app for the purpose of
                                optimization of our marketing measures (conversion optimization).
Taptica LTD
121 Ha´chashmonaim street, Tel Aviv - Israel 6713328
Collects anonymous information when you interact with the app for the purpose of
                                optimization of our marketing measures (conversion optimization).
Inmobi Pte. Ltd
30 Cecile Street, 19-08 Prudential Tower Singapore, 049712
Collects anonymous information when you interact with the app for the purpose of
                                optimization of our marketing measures (conversion optimization).
AppNext Ltd
Intershore Chambers, Road Town, Tortola, British Virgin Island
Collects anonymous information when you interact with the app for the purpose of
                                optimization of our marketing measures (conversion optimization).
Jampp LTD
Studio 103, 242 Acklam Road, London, UK 110 5 JJ
Processes information in order to display interest-based advertising based on inferred
                                interests or preferences.
                                Also processes information in aggregated form for the purposes of performance and
                                service improvement and fraud prevention.
TIRBURTINA S.A. /Lemmonet
Avda. Rivera 7043 - Montevideo, Uruguay, 11500
Collects anonymous information when you interact with the app for the purpose of
                                optimization of our marketing measures (conversion optimization).
Adperio
2000 S. Colorado Blvd Tower 1 Suite 7000, Denver, CO 80222, USA
Collects anonymous information when you interact with the app for the purpose of
                                conversion optimization.
Remerge GmbH
Oranienburger Straße 27, 10117 Berlin
Processes information in order to display interest-based advertising based on inferred
                                interests or preferences.
                                Also processes information in aggregated form for the purposes of performance and
                                service improvement and fraud prevention.
Stroeer Mobile Performance GmbH
Erftstraße 19 a, 50672 Cologne
Collects anonymous information when you interact with the app for the purpose of
                                conversion optimization.
Branch
1400 Seaport Blvd
                                Building B, 2nd Floor
                                Redwood City, CA 94063
                                USA
Branch collects your phone number when you interact with the "text me the
                                ticket" feature. This feature will make sure you receive an SMS showing how to
                                download the app with the ticket pre-loaded. This happens on mobile web or on desktop
                                web interfaces.
Myappfree S.R.L.
Via Selice 84/A, Imola, 40026 (BO) Italy
Collects anonymous information when you interact with the app for the purpose of
                                conversion optimization.
Evorra Ltd
Evorra Ltd
TC Group
Level 1, Devonshire House
One Mayfair Place
London W1J
                                8AJ
United
                                Kingdom
Evorra Product Privacy Policy:
https://evorra.com/privacy-data-policies/product-privacy-policy/
Sojern
Corporate Headquarters: 255 California Street, Suite 1000, San Francisco, CA 94111
Sojern Privacy Policy:
https://www.sojern.com/privacy/
Travel Audience
travel audience GmbH, Elsenstraße 106 12435 Berlin
Please find travel audience privacy policy here:
https://travelaudience.com/website-privacy-policy/
Adara
Adara Inc, 1070 E Meadow Circle, Palo Alto, 94303, California, USA
You will find more information regarding data protection and cookies here:
https://adara.com/privacy-promise/
Forter
Forter Ltd, 7 Tozeret Haaretz Street, Tel Aviv, 6780104 Israel
We are using the services of our trusted service provider in order to help us prevent
                                online frauds. Our service provider may use and process your personal information in
                                accordance with applicable privacy and data protection laws. You can read about the ways
                                by which our service provider may use and process your personal information in this
                                regard at :
https://forter.com/privacy-policy/
If you are using the app, you can prevent data transfer to all retargeting providers at any time by using
                the switch at the bottom of this page.
When clicking the opt-out switch at the bottom of this page, we will disable the SDKs that allow us to
                recognize you. Your opt-out will take effect upon your first subsequent use our App (i.e., after you
                restart the App). The opt-out switch prevents tracking when you use the App. To prevent tracking or
                retargeting on the Service Sites, you must set the opt-out cookie by clicking the opt-out button in your
                browser settings.
III. With whom do we share your Data?
1. Data processing by Our subsidiaries
Omio Corp. employs Omio Travel GmbH and Omio Services GmbH, (Warschauer Platz 12, 10245 Berlin,
                Germany) as a service provider to, among other things, operate computer systems, handle order processing
                and perform customer service. We may share your information with, and among, our affiliated in order to
                enhance the products and services that we provide. To the extent that affiliates have access to your
                information, they will follow practices that are at least as restrictive as the practices set forth in
                this privacy policy.
Omio Travel GmbH and Omio Services GmbH are subsidiaries of Omio Corp. Your personal data will be
                forwarded to Omio Travel GmbH and/or Omio Services GmbH or collected directly by Omio Travel GmbH and/or
                Omio Services GmbH on behalf of Omio Corp. Omio Travel GmbH and Omio Services GmbH will process your
                data solely in compliance with this privacy policy and only for the purposes of performing services for
                Omio Corp., for running the Service Sites, the App, related platforms and providing associated
                services. This privacy information therefore applies to data processing by Omio Travel GmbH and Omio
                Services GmbH as well. You can contact our data protection officer at
privacy@omio.com
.
We contractually oblige Omio Travel GmbH and Omio Services GmbH to observe the provisions of this privacy
                information, to process your data for the aforementioned purposes only and to observe all applicable
                data protection and data security law and regulations.
2. Data transmission related to bookings
a) Transportation provider
When you make a booking on the Service Sites or the App, we will transmit any personal data (including
                loyalty program membership information) required to execute such booking to the respective
                transportation provider (e.g. airline, railway or coach operator) so that the transportation provider
                can process your booking and produce any personalized tickets that may be required. Such a third-party
                will then process your personal data under its own responsibility and in accordance with its own privacy
                policies. We therefore strongly recommend that you carefully review the privacy policy for each such
                transportation service provider prior to making your booking.
Bookings may be handled by our subsidiary, Omio Voyages SAS. In such cases, we transmit the required data
                to Omio Voyages SAS, which processes the data on our behalf and only for the purposes of completing the
                booking process.
This data transfer requires that your explicit consent is given for each booking process, pursuant to
                Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR.
To the extent that we participate in a corporate transaction, divestiture, merger, consolidation, or
                asset sale, or in the unlikely event of bankruptcy, we will inform the buyer that it shall only use your
                personal information for the purposes disclosed in this privacy policy. From time to time, we may also
                share aggregate or anonymous information with third-parties, including advertisers and investors. For
                example, we may tell our investors the number of visitors that the Service Sites receive on a monthly
                basis, or we may tell advertisers where the most popular travel destinations are each month.
b) Payment providers
The payment details (credit card information) for bookings made directly on the Service Sites or through
                the App are processed by a trusted internet payment processor, who will transmit your data directly to
                the relevant credit card company.
In order to ensure that the credit card is being used by its legitimate owner, and to prevent cases of
                online fraud, encrypted credit card information is transferred to an external payment security service
                for auditing purposes. This transfer may also include additional personal data.
Your credit card data is processed by trusted and reliable internet payment processors. Your credit card
                details are encrypted (usually using the SSL protocol) before transmission to the payment processor.
                Your credit card data will not be disclosed to us by the payment processors.
c) Accommodation providers
In addition, the basic information of your query (such as destination and travel time) will be forwarded
                to the accommodation service providers displayed in the search window (e.g. Booking.com or Airbnb) - but
                only if you have explicitly included the respective service provider in the search query by selecting a
                checkbox. The service provider will then present you with non-binding offers matching your search query
                in a new window or tab. A transfer of personal data (except for the IP address) does not take place on
                our side.
3. Other service providers
We may use third party service providers, in particular for technical and business services, tax advisors
                and legal counsel. This may include hosting providers, including a content delivery network to cache and
                provide content, statistics and analytics, providers to handle service desk and support data, provision
                of CRM systems, sending of newsletters/mailings, spam and fraud prevention, IT service and development
                providers.
These service providers receive personal data solely for the performance of their services for us on our
                behalf. They are contractually obliged not to use personal data for other purposes.
4. Recipients outside of the EU
The data processing mentioned under Sec. I2a, I6-9, II2,3, III2,3 may result in data transmission to
                recipients outside of the EU. The data transmission is then based on the EC model contracts (
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/international-transfers/transfer/index_en.htm
).
Personal information may be transferred to third-parties, such as transportation providers, located in
                non-EU countries, in which the travel is scheduled to take place. Omio cannot provide any further
                information on the level of data protection offered in non-EU countries. Neither an adequacy decision in
                accordance with Art. 45 para. 3 GDPR or appropriate safeguards in accordance with Art 46 GDPR are
                required for such data transfer as it is necessary:
For the performance of a contract between you and Omio or the implementation of pre-contractual
                measures taken at your request (Art. 49(1)(b) GDPR); or for the conclusion or performance of a contract
                concluded in your interest between Omio and another natural or legal person (Art. 49(1)(c) GDPR).
IV. Purposes and legal basis of data processing
We will only process personal information in ways that are compatible with the purposes outlined in this
                privacy policy (or those you later authorize). We process your personal data for the following purposes
                and on the following legal basis:
a) Pursuant to Art. 6(1)(b) GDPR to enter into, perform, modify or terminate a contractual relationship
                with you, in particular:
to enable your access and use of the Service Sites and the App,
to facilitate your search queries and bookings,
to perform our contractual obligations,
to personalize your ticket or booking and to contact you with regards to the booking process or your
                    user account, for example to send you travel documents,
to facilitate your account login on the Service Sites or the App (user account functionality), to
                    recognize you as a user and spare you from re-entering your data upon your revisits to the Service
                    Sites or the App.
b) Pursuant to Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR based on our legitimate interests,
to improve the Service Sites, Apps and our other services and to adapt them to the needs of our
                    users,
to perform internal quality checks,
to prevent, detect, process and investigate malfunctions, incidents, fraudulent or other illegal
                    activities, or mitigate the risk of occurrence of the aforementioned events,
to ensure network and information security,
to create statistics on access channels, the use the Service Sites and App and the frequency of
                    transition to our partner’s websites and services,
for internal accounting and invoicing purposes with the respective transportation providers,
                    accommodation or other partners and service providers,
to personalize the Service Sites, the App, and our offers,
to display advertisements and special offers that may match your interests (or reduce your exposure
                    to advertising and special offers which you may find uninteresting),
for marketing purposes and to optimize our marketing measures,
to enable your interaction with social networks and other users, in order to improve our offers and
                    make it more interesting for our users, to contact you, if requested by you or as necessary to
                    fulfil the contract or as otherwise permitted by law,
for the purpose of business process outsourcing to affiliated companies,
enforcing obligations owed to us, and contractual terms and conditions, accounting, risk management
                    and record keeping.
When using personal data to serve the above-mentioned legitimate interests, we will always balance your
                rights and interests in protecting your personal data against the rights and interests of our company,
                our affiliates, and trusted third-parties.
c) Pursuant to Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR based on your consent,
to send you newsletter emails or other marketing push messages (see above),
to transfer data for certain bookings to our partner Amadeus and to transfer Facebook Data (see
                    above).
d) Pursuant to Art. 6(1)(c) GDPR to comply with legal obligations, e.g. to observe retention periods
                required by trade or tax law or to comply with obligations to disclose data based on a legally binding
                court decision or official order.
V. Rights of the data subject, right to lodge complaints, right to object; Changes to
                this policy
In addition to the right to revoke your consent given to us, where applicable, you have the right to
                request access to (Art. 15 GDPR) and rectification (Art. 16 GDPR) or erasure (Art. 17 GDPR) of personal
                data or restriction of processing (Art. 18 GDPR), the right to object (Art. 21 GDPR) and the right to
                data portability (Art. 20 GDPR).
You have the right to object to all types of processing described in this privacy policy for information
                that are based on Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR, based on grounds relating to your particular situation (Art. 21(1)
                GDPR).
To the extent we process your personal data pursuant to Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR for direct marketing purposes,
                you can object to such processing at any time without giving a reason.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority (Art. 77 GDPR). The competent
                supervisory authority for Omio is:
Berliner Beauftragte für Datenschutz und Informationsfreiheit
Friedrichstr. 219, 10969 Berlin, Germany
Fax: +49 (0)30 2155050
E-Mail:
mailbox@datenschutz-berlin.de
Any inquiries, complaints or questions regarding this policy or your personal ‎information should be
                addressed to our Data Protection Officer at the following email address:
privacy@omio.com
.
You opted out of tracking for advertising purposes. Click below to change that:
You opted out of tracking for advertising purposes. Click below to change that:
Allow tracking for advertising
                            purposes
Don't
                            track me for advertising purposes
We may make changes or updates to this privacy policy from time to time or as required in response to
                changing legal, technical or business developments. When we update our privacy policy, we will take
                appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make, and in
                accordance with applicable law. You can see when this policy was last updated by viewing the “last
                updated’ date displayed at the top of this privacy policy.
Home
Privacy Policy
Train Tickets
Trains to Rome
Trains to Paris
Trains to Venice
Trains to Berlin
Trains to Sorrento
Trains France
Trains Germany
Trains Italy
Trains Spain
London to Brussels train
New York to Boston train
Manchester to London train
London to Amsterdam train
Barcelona to Madrid train
Alicante to Madrid train
Belfast to Dublin train
London to Berlin train
Pisa to Florence train
Porto to Lisbon train
Brussels to Bruges train
Rome to Florence train
Paris to Barcelona train
Coach Tickets
Coaches Spain
Coaches in the Netherlands
Coaches to Paris
Coaches to Barcelona
Coaches to Madrid
Coaches to Murcia
Split to Dubrovnik bus
Bus from Stansted to London
Paris to London bus
Coaches Germany
Coaches Sweden
Coaches Italy
Coaches France
Naples to Sorrento bus
Zadar to Split bus
London to Bournemouth coach
Bristol to Glastonbury bus
Rome to florence bus
London to Lisbon bus
Lisbon to Faro bus
Split to Zadar bus
Sorrento to Naples bus
Plane Tickets
Flights to Berlin
Flights to Paris
Flights to Barcelona
Flights to Madrid
Flights to Spain
Flights to Italy
Flights to France
Flights to Germany
Flights to Switzerland
Ryanair
London to Prague flights
London to Ibiza flights
London to Faro flights
London to Valencia flights
London to Warsaw flights
London to Stockholm flights
London to Split flights
Barcelona to London flights
London to Lisbon flights
London to Marseille flights
London to Pisa flights
London to Palma flights
Travel
Airports in the UK
Train Stations in the UK
Travel Booking
National Rail
Travel to London
Travel App
Sustainable Travel
Cheap Train Tickets UK
Travel in Germany
Travel in Italy
Travel in Spain
Travel in France
Travel in Netherlands
Key Worker Discount
Night Trains
Compare Trains
Compare Flights
London to Paris
More routes, destinations and providers
Imprint
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy
Currency
GBP
Currency
[menuItemContent]
[menuItemRightSideContent]
Language
Language
[menuItemContent]
[menuItemRightSideContent]
Your bookings
Useful links
Trains
London to Manchester
London to Brighton train
Glasgow to London train
London to Edinburgh train
London to Liverpool train
London to Paris train
Copenhagen to Stockholm train
Madrid to Barcelona train
Boston to New York train
New York City to Philadelphia train
Featured Destinations
Avanti West Coast
South Western Railway
LNER
Northern Rail
Great Western Railway
Eurostar
Renfe
Deutsche Bahn
SNCF
Chiltern Railways
Coaches
London to Paris coach
London to Prague bus
London to Stansted coach
London to Manchester coach
London to Liverpool coach
Bristol to London coach
London to Calais bus
Bilbao to San Sebastian bus
London to Amsterdam coach
Featured Destinations
National Express
FlixBus
BlaBlacar Bus
Alsa
Ecolines
Academy
RedCoach
Lux Express
RegioJet
Avanza
Megabus
Flights
London to Paris flight
London to Gibraltar flight
London to Benidorm flight
Amsterdam to London flight
Valencia to Lisbon flight
Paris to Barcelona flight
Rome to Paris flight
Milan to Paris flight
Paris to Venice flight
Featured Destinations
Aer Lingus
KLM
British Airways
Ryanair
easyJet
Vueling Airlines
Eurowings
SWISS
Wizz Air
Iberia
Ferries
Dover to Dunkirk
Dunkirk to Dover
Holyhead to Dublin ferry
Dover to Calais ferry
Liverpool to Belfast ferry
Belfast to Blackpool ferry
Norwich to Amsterdam ferry
Santorini to Athens ferry
Naples to Palermo ferry
Ibiza to Barcelona ferry
Sorrento to Positano ferry
Naples to Sorrento ferry
Calais to Dover ferry
Supetar to Split ferry
Stockholm to Helsinki ferry
Featured Destinations
Seajets
SNAV
Blue Star Ferries
Moby Lines
NLG
Sign in
How we use cookies
Like most websites, we use cookies to make sure our site works seamlessly for you by improving and customizing your experience with us. By choosing "Accept all", you are agreeing to store all cookies on your device and use them for personalized advertising. This helps us analyze site usage and assists our marketing efforts. You can easily manage your cookies in “Settings.” Find more information by reading our
privacy policy
.
Accept all
Manage settings
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
http://www.google.com/intl/de/analytics/learn/privacy.html:
Faster, smarter marketing
Introducing Google Marketing Platform, a unified advertising and analytics platform for smarter marketing and better results.
Sign in to Google Marketing Platform
Sign in to Google Marketing Platform
Easy-to-use tools for small businesses
Get free tools to make the most of your marketing, from site and app analytics to intuitive testing and more.
See small-business solutions
Advanced solutions for large enterprises
Make deeper customer connections to drive better marketing results with a complete set of advertising and analytics solutions.
See enterprise solutions
Our Adidas teams
work together in one environment
where we can see audience insights, what creative we’re running and where, how it’s performing, and make changes almost in real time.
Chris Murphy
,
          Head of Digital Experience,
              Adidas
GMP_Logo_analytics
Analytics
Understand your customers so you can deliver better experiences.
Learn more about Analytics
Analytics
Understand your customers so you can deliver better experiences.
Tag Manager
Manage all your tags without editing code.
Campaign Manager 360
Get a complete view of all your digital media campaigns.
Display & Video 360
Reach today’s always-connected audiences wherever they are.
Search Ads 360
Get real-time data and unified insights for your search campaigns.
1
Bain report: How top brands grow with timely customer connections.
New research from Bain shows how leading marketers are using platform integrations and technology to boost customer engagement by delivering more relevant experiences in the moment.
Read more
Case Study
Deckers Brands drives business growth with Google Marketing Platform and Google Cloud
Read more
Feature Brief
Control how data is used in Google Analytics
Read more
Guide
Meeting the data challenge with Google Marketing Platform and Google Cloud
Read more
1
See all resources
Let’s partner up.
Whether you’re looking for help with a single project or a bigger, long-term partnership, Google Marketing Platform Partners have the resources and expertise you need to help you achieve more with your marketing.
Find a partner
Help when you need it.
We’re here to support you every step of the way, whether you use a single product or the entire Google Marketing Platform.
Get support
Sub-policy 1
https://business.safety.google/privacy/:
business.safety.google uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Learn more about
how Google processes personal information
Google's use of information
Helps you understand how Google uses personal information it receives from sites or apps that use our advertising services.
Read more
Privacy Policy
Helps you understand what information Google collects and why, how we use it, and how you can review, manage, delete and update it.
Read more
Data use across Google services
Helps you understand how personal data is shared across Google services and how Google handles personal data received from our advertising partners.
Read more
Sub-policy 2
https://policies.google.com/privacy/frameworks?hl=en-US:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Legal frameworks for data transfers
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
We maintain servers around the world and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in the
Privacy Policy
. We also comply with certain legal frameworks relating to the transfer of data, such as the frameworks described below.
Adequacy decisions
The European Commission has determined that certain countries outside of the European Economic Area (EEA) adequately protect personal information, which means that data can be transferred from the European Union (EU) and Norway, Liechtenstein, and Iceland to those countries. The UK and Switzerland have adopted similar adequacy mechanisms. We rely on the following adequacy mechanisms:
European Commission adequacy decisions
UK adequacy regulations
Swiss adequacy decisions
EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks
As described in our
Data Privacy Framework certification
, we comply with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks (DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF as set forth by the US Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use and retention of personal information from the EEA, Switzerland and the UK, respectively. Google LLC (and its wholly-owned US subsidiaries unless explicitly excluded) has certified that it adheres to the DPF Principles. Google remains responsible for any of your personal information that is shared under the Onward Transfer Principle with third parties for external processing on our behalf, as described in the
“Sharing your information” section of our Privacy Policy
. To learn more about the DPF, and to view Google’s certification, please visit the
DPF website
.
If you have an inquiry regarding our privacy practices in relation to our DPF certification, we encourage you to
contact us
. Google is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission. You may also refer a complaint to your local data protection authority and we will work with them to resolve your concern. In certain circumstances, the DPF provides the right to invoke binding arbitration to resolve complaints not resolved by other means, as described in
Annex I to the DPF Principles
.
Standard contractual clauses
Standard contractual clauses (SCCs) are written commitments between parties that can be used as a ground for data transfers from the EEA to third countries by providing appropriate data protection safeguards. SCCs have been approved by the European Commission and can not be modified by the parties using them (you can see the SCCs adopted by the European Commission
here
,
here
, and
here
). Such clauses have also been approved for transfers of data to countries outside the UK and Switzerland. We rely on SCCs for our data transfers where required and in instances where they are not covered by an adequacy decision. If you want to obtain a copy of the SCCs, you can
contact us
.
Google may also incorporate SCCs into contracts with customers of its business services, including
Google Workspace
,
Google Cloud Platform
,
Google Ads
, and other
ads and measurement products
. Learn more at
privacy.google.com/businesses
.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 3
https://www.braze.com/privacy/:
Legal
/
Privacy Policy...
Privacy Policy
For individuals interested in learning more about how we handle personal data related to job applications and recruitment, please
refer to our Candidate Privacy Policy for detailed information on our privacy practices
.
Last Updated:
February 27, 2025
TABLE OF CONTENTS
PART I. GENERAL INFORMATION
1.1 OUR COMMITMENT TO PRIVACY
1.2 INTRODUCTION TO BRAZE
1.3 SCOPE OF THIS POLICY
PART II. DATA COLLECTION AND USE
2.1 DATA COLLECTION
2.2 PURPOSES OF PROCESSING
2.3 DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION TO THIRD PARTIES
PART III. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS, SECURITY AND DATA RETENTION
3.1 PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA IN THE U.S. AND ELSEWHERE
3.2 SECURITY
3.3 DATA RETENTION
PART IV. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
4.1 EXERCISING YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
4.2 PRIVACY RIGHTS AND BRAZE CUSTOMERS
4.3 MARKETING AND ADVERTISING
4.4 COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
4.5 CHAT TECHNOLOGIES
PART V. LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA
PART VI. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
6.1 YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS.
6.2 CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA THAT WE COLLECT AND THIRD PARTIES TO WHOM THE DATA MAY BE DISCLOSED
6.3 THE SALE AND SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
6.4 SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION AND DE-IDENTIFIED DATA
PART VII. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR JAPANESE VISITORS
7.1 PERSONAL DATA DISCLOSURE
7.2 BRAZE JAPAN’S INFORMATION
PART VIII. OTHER IMPORTANT INFORMATION
8.1 CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
8.2 CHILDREN
8.3 HOW TO CONTACT US
PART I. GENERAL INFORMATION
1.1 OUR COMMITMENT TO PRIVACY
Your privacy is important to us and maintaining your trust is one of our highest priorities. This Privacy Policy provides you with a description of how we collect and use data relating to or identifying individuals (“
Personal Data
”). We also provide information on privacy rights, how to exercise these rights and how to contact us with any questions.
1.2 INTRODUCTION TO BRAZE
Braze is a U.S. company, headquartered in New York, with global operations. A reference to “
Braze
,” “
we
,” “
us
” or the “
Company
” is a reference to Braze, Inc. and the relevant affiliate(s) involved in the processing activity.
Braze is a life-cycle engagement platform for companies around the world, supporting stronger relationships between brands and their clients, primarily by leveraging first party data to personalize and automate life-cycle marketing campaigns through first party channels, such as email, SMS, mobile and web push notifications, and in-app/in-browser messaging.
More information about Braze can be found on our
main website
. For details specific to our services in Japan, please visit the
Braze Japan website
.
1.3 SCOPE OF THIS POLICY
What is in Scope?
This Privacy Policy applies to Braze, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of Personal Data for our marketing or business purposes (further details below) and in such capacity, we will use the term “Data Controller”.
What is not in Scope?
Our Websites and Services are intended to be used by businesses and their representatives. We do not offer any products or services to individuals for personal, family or household use. All Personal Data that we process is treated as belonging to individuals in a business capacity.
Braze’s privacy commitments to its customers, where we process Personal Data on behalf of our customers, are outlined in Braze’s agreements with such customers. In our capacity as a processor of our customers’ data, we will refer to ourselves as a “Data Processor.” Specifically, in that capacity, Braze processes Personal Data of people who interact with customer applications or websites that are offered by our customers and that have incorporated Braze technology (“
Customer Applications
”). The protections that apply to such Personal Data will be described in the individual privacy policies of those customers, and not in this Privacy Policy. If you wish to learn more about the privacy and data security practices of those customers, you should reach out to them directly. For clarity, this Privacy Policy does not cover any Personal Data that our customers choose to collect and share with Braze, where Braze is not the Data Controller, but is instead a Data Processor.
Individuals who are interested in, apply for, or are recruited for a job with Braze can find our related privacy practices described in our Candidate's Privacy Policy. For more details, please
view our Candidate Privacy Policy
.
Additionally, our Websites or Services (as defined below) may contain links to other websites, applications and services maintained by third parties. The privacy and data security practices of such third-party sites and/or services are governed by the privacy statements of those third parties, and not by this Privacy Policy.
PART II. DATA COLLECTION AND USE
2.1 DATA COLLECTION
The Personal Data that Braze collects will be determined by your interaction with Braze, our partners, Braze publications and other sources.
How and where do we collect data?
Braze collects Personal Data from prospects, customers, participants at our trainings, certifications and events, business partners and vendors (if they are natural persons), their respective employees, advisors, and/or consultants, along with the data of whomever our customers have authorized to use free and paid versions of the Braze services (the “
Services
”) on their behalf (collectively, “
Individuals
”), who:
Visit our websites (the “
Websites
”);
Visit our offices;
Receive/send communications from/to us, including via mail, email, phone call, Slack, chat features of our Websites, support tickets or texts;
Use our Services as an authorized user (for example, an employee of one of our customers who has been given a log-in to access our Services) (
"Dashboard User"
);
Register for, attend and/or otherwise take part in our events, webinars, contests, trainings and certification courses;
Download or otherwise engage with Braze content and publications, such as viewing our videos, reading content on our Websites, or interacting with our chat bot;
Submit requests for an action, support or information;
Participate in meetings or events;
Engage with our resellers or partners;
Work at partners or suppliers of Braze and interact with our company in the course of doing business or contemplating doing business with us; or
Otherwise directly interact with Braze.
Braze collects Personal Data from a variety of sources, such as from:
The Individual who is the subject of such Personal Data, including in their use of the Websites and the Services;
Publicly available sources, such as an individual’s social media account, online communities, forums, blogs or chat rooms;
Our business partners;
Vendors; and
Braze affiliates.
What type of data do we collect?
Personal Data that we may collect includes, but is not limited to:
Name and job title;
Contact information such as email address, business phone number, and business address;
Industry;
Employer;
Marketing subscription status;
Audio and video recordings and notes from meetings;
Event attendance and preferences associated with in-person event attendance, such as dietary requirements;
Trainings and certifications;
Downloads or engagement with Braze reports and other publications;
Communications that we exchange with you, including when you contact us with questions or feedback, through the support portal, email, calls to our support team, our chat features, social media, survey participation, or otherwise;
Certain information in connection with the use of the Websites by visitors and the Services by Dashboard Users, and information about your interaction with other relevant third-party pages displaying Braze content, which may include:
Device Data: information may include IP address (or proxy server), device and application identification numbers, location, browser type, Internet service provider and/or mobile carrier, and operating system and system configuration information; and
Usage Data: information, such as activity on the Websites and Services, the pages and files viewed, actions taken, conversations through our chat features, searches, account configuration information and date/time stamps associated with your usage.
Some of the information described above is collected through our Websites and our Services using logs, cookies and/or other tracking technologies. To read more about the cookies and tracking technologies we use, please visit our
Cookie Policy
. You are able to
manage your cookie consent preferences
.
We also use session replay technology provided by third-party vendors to record the interactions and Personal Data of Dashboard Users and visitors to certain Websites, such as our learning management system. We and such third-party vendors may use information from these recordings, which may include the Usage Data detailed above. Personal Data within these recordings may be processed for the purposes outlined in Section 2.2 of this Privacy Policy. Such recordings do not include Personal Data for which Braze is a Data Processor.
2.2 PURPOSES OF PROCESSING
Braze collects Personal Data for several purposes, including:
Enabling us to understand and engage with those who are interested in learning about our products, services, content, and company-related initiatives;
Promoting the security of our Websites and Services by tracking use of our Websites and Services, enforcing our terms and policies, investigating and preventing fraudulent, suspicious or illegal activities, and preventing unauthorized access to the Services;
Providing, operating, and maintaining the Services including billing and account management purposes;
Responding to requests for action, support or information;
Complying with our contractual obligation to provide technical and customer success support;
Registering office visitors to maintain the security of our offices and to ensure the confidentiality of our business activities;
Analyzing our customers' use of the Services and Websites for trend monitoring, marketing, advertising, business development, for improvements, for security purposes and to ensure continued proper functioning;
Marketing purposes;
To send marketing communications about us and our affiliates and partners, including information about our products, promotions or events via email and other channels;
To facilitate targeted advertising campaigns;
To send marketing communications about us and our affiliates and partners, including information about our products, promotions or events via email and other channels;
For internal training and research;
Sending messages to Dashboard Users about technical alerts, updates, security notifications, and educational, administrative or transactional communications; and
Complying and assisting with legal obligations, judicial proceedings, court orders and legal processes, pursuing remedies available to us and limiting our damages, responding to lawful requests and pursuing internal investigations.
Where we need to collect and process Personal Data by law, or under a contract we have entered into with you, and you fail to provide the required Personal Data when requested, we may not be able to comply with our legal obligations or perform our contract with you.
If you provide us with Personal Data relating to another person, you confirm that you have informed them of our identity, the purposes (as set out above) for which their Personal Data will be used, and that you have obtained their consent prior to sharing their Personal Data with us.
2.3 DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION TO THIRD PARTIES
We may disclose Personal Data to the following types of third parties and for the following purposes:
Braze Affiliates -
We may disclose Personal Data to Braze corporate group affiliates in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development, operations, account management, events or webinars, for general business purposes, in order to protect, exercise, establish or defend legal rights, where we are legally required to do so and to receive professional advice.
Partners -
If you use our Websites to register for an event or webinar organized by one of our partners, we may disclose your Personal Data to these partners to process your registration and manage your participation in the event. In such instances, our partner will process the relevant Personal Data as a separate controller and the partner’s use and control over your Personal Data will be governed by their privacy policy. We may also disclose your Personal Data to technology and solutions partners in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development and account management.
Vendors –
We may disclose Personal Data to third party vendors and service providers for general business purposes and to support our internal operations, including IT solutions vendors, marketing vendors, advertising vendors, consultants, professional advisers acting as processors or controllers, including lawyers, bankers, auditors and insurers. We may also disclose Personal Data where we believe it necessary in order to protect or exercise, establish or defend our legal rights.
Shared Communities -
Any Personal Data or other information you choose to submit in communities, forums, blogs or chat rooms on our Websites may be read, collected and used by others who visit these forums, depending on your account settings.
Law Enforcement -
We may disclose Personal Data to a third party where we are legally required to do so in order to comply with any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request, including government authorities, law enforcement and others.
Corporate Transaction Participants -
We may transfer Personal Data in connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
PART III. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS, SECURITY AND DATA RETENTION
3.1 PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA IN THE U.S. AND ELSEWHERE
Braze, Inc. is located in the United States ("
U.S.
") and our group companies operate in Singapore, Germany, Japan, Canada, France, Australia, Indonesia, the United Kingdom ("
UK
"), Ireland, Romania, Brazil, South Korea and the United Arab Emirates. Braze works with vendors and partners who operate predominantly in these countries. From time to time, we may work with vendors and partners in other parts of the world where we do business. This means that when we collect your Personal Data, we may process it in any of these countries. These countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective), but we have in place appropriate safeguards and international transfer mechanisms (e.g., the Data Privacy Framework or the EU Standard Contractual Clauses). We also implement a number of supplementary measures designed to better protect the Personal Data with which we are entrusted.
Where available, Braze, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (collectively, the “Data Privacy Framework”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data transferred from the European Union, the UK, and Switzerland, as applicable, to the US in reliance on the Data Privacy Framework. For more details, please
read our Data Privacy Framework Notice
.
For non-US transfers, Braze may rely on an alternative transfer mechanism, including the 2021 EU Standard Contractual Clauses, to transfer Personal Data from the UK and European Economic Area ("
EEA
") to other third-party countries.
3.2 SECURITY
We use a number of technical, organizational and administrative security measures designed to protect the security, confidentiality and integrity of information. However, security risk is inherent in internet and information technologies and we cannot guarantee the security of your Personal Data.
3.3 DATA RETENTION
We will retain Personal Data we collect from you for so long as we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (in connection with the purposes set out in Part II above). We determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data on the basis of the purpose for which we process the Personal Data, the amount, nature and sensitivity of your Personal Data processed, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Data and whether we can achieve the purposes of the processing through other means, as well as on the basis of applicable legal requirements (such as applicable statutes of limitation). When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your Personal Data, we will either delete or anonymize it.
PART IV. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
4.1 EXERCISING YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
You may have the right under applicable law to request that we take certain actions in connection with Personal Data that we may have about you. Not all jurisdictions grant privacy rights, so whether or not you have any such rights, and the nature of those rights, if any, are determined by multiple factors, including your location, country, state, or place of residence. Privacy rights may include the following:
Information:
You may be able to request information about the categories of Personal Data we collect, the categories of sources from which we collect it, the purposes for which we process it, and the categories of third parties to whom we disclose it.
Access:
You may be able to request access to the Personal Data we hold about you.
Rectification/correction
: You may be able to request modification or correction of your Personal Data if it is inaccurate or incomplete.
Erasure/deletion:
You may be able to request that we delete Personal Data we hold about you.
Restriction:
You may be able to request that we restrict use of your Personal Data.
Objection:
You may be able to object to the processing of your Personal Data for direct marketing or where our legal basis for the processing is our legitimate interest.
Portability:
You may be able to request a copy of your Personal Data in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format, to allow you to transfer your data to another provider.
Automated Decision Making:
You may be able to request not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, where it produces a legal or similar effect.
If you wish to exercise any of these requests, please
fill out the form provided
. We will respond to requests from individuals wishing to exercise data protection rights applicable to them. For certain rights, such as where you request access to Personal Data, we will need to confirm your identity. To verify your identity, we will require you to provide ID, where permitted or required by applicable law. You also have the right to exercise your applicable privacy rights free from discriminatory treatment and retaliation as prohibited by applicable law. These rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline or partially decline your request as permitted by law.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your Personal Data. For more information, please contact your local supervisory authority. If you have a question about your privacy rights, please email us at
privacy@braze.com
.
4.2 PRIVACY RIGHTS AND BRAZE CUSTOMERS
Braze customers may collect Personal Data through their websites or applications and send that data to the Braze Services. Where you wish to enforce any of your rights in respect of such data, we encourage you to contact the customer who provides you with the Customer Application, as this will be the quickest way to have your request processed. Where you submit a request about a Braze customer and you are able to identify the customer, we forward your request to the customer to handle.
4.3 MARKETING AND ADVERTISING
At any time, you have the right to opt-out of marketing communications that we send, or object to the use of your personal data for behavioral advertising. You can exercise these rights by
visiting the Braze Preference Center
for managing your communication preferences, or by using the contact details provided under the '
How to Contact Us
' heading below. Dashboard Users of the Services may exercise this right through preference center options available within the Services. Where applicable, you may also opt-out through unsubscribe options available within the marketing communication itself.
Please note that opting-out of the receipt of marketing communications or objecting to the use of your personal data for behavioral advertising does not opt you out of receiving important business communications related to your current relationship with us, such as communications about event registrations, service announcements or security information.
4.4 COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
You can manage your cookie preferences by
visiting our Cookie Consent Manager to customize your cookie settings
. Please see our
Cookie Policy
for further information on cookies and other tracking technologies.
4.5 CHAT TECHNOLOGIES
We use chat technologies provided by third-party vendors that employ cookies and software code to operate the chat features you can use to communicate with us through our Websites. We and such third-party vendors may monitor, record and use information from your interactions with our Websites. This information includes details you have shared through online chats, data on sections of the Website you have visited, your IP address and your general geographic information (e.g., city, state). This Personal Data may be processed for the purposes outlined in Section 2.2 of this Privacy Policy.
PART V. LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA
If you are from a region that requires us to have a legal basis for processing your Personal Data, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only where we have your consent to do so, where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
PART VI. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
If you are a California resident, this section applies to you in addition to the rest of the Privacy Policy. It provides more detail on how we collect, use and disclose Personal Information of California residents in operating our business, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this Part VI, Personal Information has the meaning given in the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (“
CCPA
”). However, this Part VI does not apply:
To information exempted from the scope of the CCPA;
To Personal Information we collect, use, and disclose on behalf of our customers as a "service provider" under the CCPA for purposes of providing our Services to them.
6.1 YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
As a California resident, you have information, access, rectification/correction, erasure/deletion, and non-discrimination rights as described in Part IV (Your Privacy Rights). In addition, you have the right to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of Personal Information as those terms are defined by the CCPA.
If you have appointed an authorized agent to act on your behalf, your authorized agent may request to exercise these rights on your behalf upon our verification of the agent’s identity and our receipt of a copy of a valid power of attorney given to your authorized agent pursuant to applicable California law. If you have not provided your agent with such a power of attorney, we may ask you and/or your agent to take additional steps permitted by law to verify that your request is authorized, such as information required to verify your identity and that you have given the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
6.2 CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA THAT WE COLLECT AND THIRD PARTIES TO WHOM THE DATA MAY BE DISCLOSED
The following chart describes our practices currently in use and in use during the past 12 months. This chart summarizes the Personal Information we collect by reference to the statutory categories specified in the CCPA, and the categories of third parties to whom we may disclose it for a business purpose. These third parties are defined in Section 2.3 (Disclosure of Information to Third Parties). Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms or via email, may contain other categories of Personal Information not described below. The business/commercial purposes for which we use these categories of Personal Information listed in the below table are described above in Section 2.2 (Purposes of Processing). Our relevant data retention practices are addressed in Section 3.3 (Data Retention).
6.3 THE SALE AND SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
Like many companies, Braze uses services that employ cookies and other technologies to collect Personal Information (including the identifiers and internet activity information described in the table above) about your use of our Websites and other online services over time, which helps us to deliver behavioral advertising. In addition, we may provide your contact details to our advertising vendors for the placement of targeted ads. Braze may share contact details of business contacts with our technology or solutions partners during any sales negotiations. Our use of some of these services constitutes the “sale” or “sharing” of Personal Information as defined under the CCPA.
You may opt-out of such sales or sharing by clicking on the 'Do Not Sell or Share my Personal Information'
link
in the footer of our Websites and following the instructions therein. You can also opt-out of advertising cookies by
visiting our Cookie Consent Manager to adjust your cookie preferences
, or by enabling
Global Privacy Control
(“GPC”) in your web browser or browser extension, which we recognize to the extent required by applicable law. Enabling GPC will automatically set your cookie settings to opt out of the sharing of Personal Information for behavioral advertising. If you choose to use GPC, you will need to turn it on for each supported browser or browser extension you use. Other than GPC, we do not recognize any “do not track” signals.
Dashboard Users of the Services can also opt-out of the selling or sharing of contact details through setting preference center options available within the Services.
While our Website and Services are not directed to children under the age of 16, we are required to inform you that we have no actual knowledge that we have sold or shared the Personal Information of California residents under 16 years of age.
6.4 SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION AND DE-IDENTIFIED DATA
Braze does not use or disclose Sensitive Personal Information (as defined by the CCPA) for restricted purposes that California residents have a right to limit under the CCPA.
We do not to attempt to re-identify de-identified information that we derive from Personal Information, except for the purpose of testing whether our deidentification processes comply with applicable law.
PART VII. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR JAPANESE VISITORS
7.1 PERSONAL DATA DISCLOSURE
Braze K.K. (“
Braze Japan
”) may disclose your Personal Data to Braze group affiliates and other third parties for the purposes described in Section 2.3 (Disclosure of Information to Third Parties). A list of the Braze office locations may be found on our
Website
. The categories or items of the Personal Data that Braze Japan may disclose to a third party are the same as those described in Section 2.1 (Data Collection). When Braze Japan discloses your Personal Data to entrusted third parties, Braze Japan shall be the entity that is responsible for processing and managing your Personal Data.
7.2 BRAZE JAPAN’S INFORMATION
Braze Japan’s official name, address, and the name of the representative director can be found
on Braze Japan's company page
. If you have any questions, requests, or complaints about our processing of your Personal Data or this Privacy Policy, please follow the instructions described in Section 8.3 (How to Contact Us).
PART VIII. OTHER IMPORTANT INFORMATION
8.1 CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
If we change our Privacy Policy, we will update the “Last Updated” date at the top of this webpage. We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy frequently to stay informed of the latest modifications.
8.2 CHILDREN
Our Websites are not directed to individuals under the age of 16. We do not knowingly collect Personal Data from such individuals without parental consent and require our customers to fully comply with applicable law in the data collected from children under the age of 16. If you are a parent or guardian and believe your child has provided us with Personal Data without your consent, please contact us by using the information in the “
How to Contact Us
” section, below, and we will take steps to delete such Personal Data from our systems.
8.3 HOW TO CONTACT US
If you would like to update your preferences with regards to our marketing communications to you, you can do this in our
Preference Center
.
If you have a request regarding Braze’s processing of your Personal Data, please
fill out the request form provided here
.
If you would like to manage your cookie settings you may do so by
Visiting our Cookie Consent Manager.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, if you have a complaint, or would like to contact our DPO, you may contact us at:
privacy@braze.com
or
Braze, Inc.
Privacy Policy Issues
Attention: General Counsel
63 Madison Building
28 East 28th Street
12th Floor Mailroom
New York, NY 10016
USA
This website uses cookies and other tracking technologies, which improve your web experience, analyze site usage, and deliver personalized content to you. Some are essential to the functionality of our site, while others are optional and used only with your consent. Cookies and other tracking technologies may be stored on your device and placed by us and trusted partners. Please visit our Cookie Consent Manager for information on how this website uses cookies and other tracking technologies and to change your settings at any time. For more information please also visit our
Cookie Policy
Accept
Dismiss
Cookie Consent Manager
Cookies Consent Manager
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser in the form of cookies, or other tracking technologies, collectively referred to as “cookies” . We use four kinds of cookies on our websites: essential, functional, performance and advertising. Click on the different sections below to learn more about each category and to manage your cookie preferences. For more information please also visit our Cookie Policy.
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are essential for the website to function and they enable core functionality, such as website security.
View all Cookies‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enhance your experience on our website by remembering your preferences and personalizing customizable pages. For example, functional cookies help remember your language preference.
View all Cookies‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies enhance our website's performance. They provide analytics on website traffic and use, such as identifying which pages are most popular and if error reports have been generated.
View all Cookies‎
Advertising Cookies
These cookies are used to display relevant advertising to you on our website, on other websites and on social media platforms. Social media cookies also allow you to share content with your friends, family and networks.
View all Cookies‎
Back Button
Vendors List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 4
https://www.adjust.com/privacy-policy/:
Sorry, we couldn't find that page.
Navigate back to the homepage below.
Back to home
Sub-policy 5
https://evorra.com/privacy-data-policies/product-privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
Product Privacy Policy
Last update  2 July 2024
Privacy & Data Policies
Table of Contents
HOW WE COLLECT PERSONAL INFORMATION
PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT
HOW WE USE PERSONAL INFORMATION
HOW WE DISCLOSE PERSONAL INFORMATION
PRIVACY CHOICES
IAB’S TRANSPARENCY AND CONSENT FRAMEWORK
SECURITY
RETENTION
U.S. STATE-SPECIFIC NOTICE
EEA/UK NOTICE
CHILDREN’S DATA
THIRD-PARTY LINKS
CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
CCPA REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
CONTACT US
This Product Privacy Policy (“
Privacy Policy
”) explains how Evorra, Inc. and any affiliates including Evorra Limited (“
Evorra
”, “
we
”, “
us
” and “
our
”) collects, uses, and discloses personal information in providing the Evorra Services described in the next section. This Privacy Policy does not cover any information we collect or process from our own corporate website or how our corporate customers use our Services. T
o learn more about our website privacy practices, please visit the
Evorra Website Privacy Policy
.
About Evorra’s Services
Evorra enables brands and marketing teams to build or monetise compliant and fully addressable audiences at scale across any activation channel. We do this in two parts: First we offer a platform for companies to license their customer information, creating another revenue stream for these data providers (“
Data Providers
”). This data, along with data we source, can be licensed by brands and marketing teams (our “
Clients
”) to build addressable audiences and market to individuals across channels.
HOW WE COLLECT PERSONAL INFORMATION
We obtain data from the following sources to provide our Services:
Data Providers who are looking to monetize their data.
Our Client’s first party data, including CRM data, website tracking technologies such as cookies, and from apps via software development kits (SDKs).
Data Evorra sourced, namely information obtained from our own proprietary sources including the Evorra cookie and other similar tracking technologies, directly from individuals including via surveys, and from public resources (the “
Evorra Data
”).
PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT
Below, we provide a list of the commonly processed personal information.
Identifiers.
Unique identifiers such as cookie identifiers, device advertising identifiers (mobile advertising IDs), and pseudonymous identifiers derived from email address, phone numbers, or device information such as IP address.
Demographic Information.
Demographic information like age and gender.
Browsing/Behavioral Information.
Online behavioral information from our Data Partners, Clients, or our own proprietary cookies which may be used to determine your interests, such as websites and content viewed; mobile applications used; date and time of visits; frequency of visits; search terms used on a website; purchase and shopping events for retail websites; and browsing events for content websites.
Location Information.
Location information including imprecise location inferred from an IP address and precise geolocation if provided to us by our Data Partners or Clients.
Analytics.
We also collect information on engagement rates, number of leads generated, which campaigns are functioning best, conversion rates, and trends.
HOW WE USE PERSONAL INFORMATION
Subject to the terms of our client agreements, we may use personal information to provide our Services, including:
To create a data marketplace for our Data Partners to license their data and for our Clients to create audience segments and deliver targeted advertising across channels.
To aid our Clients in creating advertising audience segments associated with certain interests, behaviors, and attributes (for example, an interest in travel or an interest in sports).
Matching Client data with Data Partner Data and/or Evorra Data.
Enriching Data Partner and Client data.
Generate insights on a given user population.
Analyzing engagement rates, leads generated, campaign success, conversion rates, and trends.
We may also process your personal information for the following purposes:
To solicit new customers with advertising and marketing.
Customer support, including email and chat.
To improve our Services.
To comply with our agreements or policies.
To authenticate, verify or otherwise ensure compliance with Data Partner and Client written instructions or to mitigate the risk of fraud.
For any legal purpose necessary, including IP protection, or if Evorra is required to process information as a result of a court order or other legal or regulatory proceeding.
With your consent.
HOW WE DISCLOSE PERSONAL INFORMATION
Our Services provide our Data Partners and Clients with the ability to synchronize certain external software or data applications with Evorra, which may include the transfer of personal information. Some of the types of applications are:
Advertising services, including services that synchronize or otherwise combine advertising audiences with advertising inventory for programmatic advertising.
Social media networks, including custom match custom audiences.
Customer relationship management software, including email service providers.
Subject to client agreements, we may disclose information in order to:
Protect the legal rights of our company, our employees, our agents, and our affiliates.
Protect the safety and security of those who access and use our Services.
Detect and protect against fraud.
Comply with law or legal process.
Complete a legal transaction related to the sale of our business or any assets.
Evorra may disclose aggregate or anonymous information for any purpose. This means that the information we share does not identify specific individuals, or is combined with other data to protect your privacy.
PRIVACY CHOICES
You have the right to exercise the following choices with our use of your personal information:
Access.
Access the personal information we maintain about you.
Delete.
Delete the personal information we maintain about you.
Correct.
Correct inaccurate personal information we maintain about you
Opt Out.
Opt out of targeted advertising using cookies or other tracking technologies. As described herein, we process data to help our Clients personalize and deliver ads, and for other ads-related purposes, including measurement and reporting. Some of these activities may be considered ‘sales’ or ‘sharing’ of your personal information or using your personal information for purposes of ‘targeted advertising’ each as defined in applicable law. You may opt out of targeted advertising as detailed below. Please note, that you may have to provide certain information, such as your email address, in order for us to honor your opt out. We will only use your email to facilitate your opt out and for no other purposes. We will delete your email address after we have processed your opt out.
Evorra opt out.
You can opt out of cookies via our cookie preferences center by clicking on the ‘Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information’ link on our website footer.
Evorra honors the Global Privacy Control (“
GPC
”) through the same cookie consent management tool.
Industry opt out pages.
The online advertising industry provides websites from which you may set a third party cookie indicating your desire to opt out of interest-based advertising from the Trade Desk and other companies that participate in industry self-regulatory programs. The US-based opt out pages are
www.aboutads.info/choices
and
www.networkadvertising.org/choices
. The European based page is
www.youronlinechoices.com
. In Canada, use
youradchoices.ca/choices
.
For mobile apps.
Most mobile devices provide the ability to set the device’s advertising ID to an opt out value through the device settings. To learn how to use the mobile app opt out, consult your device instructions. To find information on Opting out on Mobile Devices please visit
http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice
.
For connected TVs.
Many connected TVs and related devices offer a choice mechanism similar to those offered by mobile devices. When received the Trade Desk will honor these signals. To find out more, including device specific instructions, please visit
https://www.networkadvertising.org/internet-connected-tv-choices/
.
Our Ad Sync Partners.
We disclose your information with certain advertising partners to deliver the Services documented herein. You can opt out of this disclosure as detailed in the table below.
Partner
Opt Out page
The Trade Desk
http://www.adsrvr.org
LiveRamp
https://optout.liveramp.com/opt_out
Lotame
https://www.lotame.com/privacy/privacy-manager/
Magnite
https://www.magnite.com/legal/user-choice-portal/
Pubmatic
https://pubmatic.com/legal/opt-out/
Iponweb
https://www.criteo.com/privacy/
Amazon
https://www.amazon.com/adprefs
Facebook
https://www.facebook.com/help/1075880512458213
Google
https://policies.google.com/technologies/ads
You can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@evorra.com
or via the choices below.
IAB’S TRANSPARENCY AND CONSENT FRAMEWORK
For European consumers, the Interactive Advertising Bureau Europe has adopted the Transparency Consent Framework (TCF) that enables the advertising ecosystem to capture specific types of consent for advertising purposes. The IAB TCF groups these consents into  ‘Stacks’ with consistent purposes. Evorra participates in the IAB TCF and collects and/or associates consents on behalf of its clients with the following purposes:
Purpose 1. Store and/or access information on a device
When our Pixel tracker is deployed, we install a cookie on your device(s) to recognise you as you come back to a given Web site.
Stack 8. Personalised ads and ad measurement
This stack groups p2. Select basic ads, p3. Create a personalised ads profile,  p4. Select personalised ads, p7. Measure ad performance.
We build and enrich a profile representing your interests. This profile is used to create specific user groups or audience segments.
We pass on specific user groups or segments to Demand Side Platforms so they can select and display personalised ads to you.
We collect figures so as to measure the quality of these audiences and improve their quality over time.
p9. Apply market research
to generate audience insights
We offer some marketing insights on the audiences built on the platform.
p10. Develop and improve products
We use de-identified data for internal tests and to evolve our products.
Features
f1. Match and combine offline data sources
Evorra offers the possibility to combine online data and offline data coming from our providers (for instance CRM data) or coming from 3rd parties for enrichment purposes (for instance weather information associated with a given location).
f2. Link different devices
Your profile will capture your interest across all your devices.
f3. Receive and use automatically-sent device characteristics for identification
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as IP address or browser type.
SECURITY
We maintain reasonable safeguards to protect against unauthorized access, use, modification, and disclosure of personal information in our custody and control. Despite our efforts, we cannot guarantee that unauthorized access or use will never occur.
RETENTION
We will retain personal information according to the terms of our written agreements and as required by law. Generally, Evorra retains personal information for thirteen (13) months. Evorra may retain non-personal information indefinitely.
U.S. STATE-SPECIFIC NOTICE
Some U.S. states have enacted comprehensive privacy laws. The California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act or “CPRA” (collectively, the “
CCPA
”), the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (“
VCDPA
”), the Colorado Privacy Act (“
CPA
”), the Connecticut Data Privacy Act (“
CTDPA
”) the Utah Consumer Privacy Act (“
UCPA
”), the Oregon Consumer Privacy Act (“
OCPA
”), the Texas Data Privacy and Security Act (“
TDPSA
”), and the Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act (“
MTCDPA
”) create additional privacy obligations for businesses and provide their residents with additional privacy rights.
Additional Privacy Rights
:
In addition to the rights granted above, if you are a resident of California, Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, Oregon, Texas, or Montana, you have the right to:
Opt out of the ‘sale’ or ‘share’ of your personal information for the purpose of targeted advertising.
Opt out of profiling.
Sensitive Personal Information.
Residents of Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, and Oregon have the right to opt in to the collection and use of their sensitive personal information; residents of California and Utah have the right to opt out of the collection and use of sensitive personal information.
You can exercise these rights by emailing us at
privacy@evorra.com
or via our
opt-out
webform.
Appeal
:
If we deny your privacy request, you may appeal that decision by emailing us at
privacy@evorra.com
. If you are still unsatisfied with our response, you have the right to file a complaint with your state attorney general.
Controller Designation
:
Evorra operates as a ‘Controller’ (and a ‘Business’ under the CCPA).
EEA/UK NOTICE
Residents of the United Kingdom (“
UK
”) and European Economic Area (“
EEA
”) are provided certain privacy rights under the UK and EU General Data Protection Regulations (“
GDPR
”).
Legal Basis
:
Under the GDPR, we process ‘Personal Data’ (as defined in the GDPR) under the following legal basis.
Processing Activity
Legal Basis under GDPR
Collection and Processing of Customer or Customer Personal Data to maintain and fulfill the Services
Consent, Contract Fulfillment
Use of a chatbot on our Platform
Contract Fulfillment
Improving our Services
Legitimate Interest
Service-Related Communications to Customers
Legitimate Interest
Controller Designation
:
Under the GDPR, we are designated as a ‘Controller.’
Cross-Border Data Transfers
:
Data is stored in the EU, but there may be instances in which data is stored in United States or other countries. As such, if you are a resident of the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, we may transfer to, and store the data we collect about you, to countries other than the country in which the data was originally collected, including the United States. Those countries may not have equivalent data protection laws as the country in which you provided the data. When we transfer your data to other countries, we will protect the data as described in this Privacy Policy and comply with applicable legal requirements providing adequate protection for the transfer of data to countries outside the EEA, UK, and Switzerland. We rely on Standard Contractual Clauses (“
SCCs
”) for the transfer of personal data to countries that have not received an applicable adequacy decision, as well as the UK’s ‘International Data Transfer Addendum’ to the SCCs.
For more information on cross-border transfers of your Personal Data or the appropriate safeguards in place, please contact us at
privacy@evorra.com
.
Data Protection Officer
:
We have appointed a Data Privacy Director to oversee compliance with this Privacy Notice. If you have any questions about this Privacy Notice or how we handle your Personal Data, or would like to request access to your Personal Data, please contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@evorra.com
.
Additional Rights for UK or European Economic Area Residents
:
In addition to the rights granted above, if you are a UK or EEA resident, the GDPR grants you the right to lodge a complaint against us with your local data protection authority. You can find your data protection authority at
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/about-edpb/members_en
.
CHILDREN’S DATA
We do not intentionally collect any personal information from children under the age of 16. If you believe we have obtained personal information associated with children under the age of 16, please contact us at
privacy@evorra.com
and we will delete it.
THIRD-PARTY LINKS
The Services may contain links to other sites. Please be aware that we are not responsible for the content or privacy practices of such other sites. We encourage our users to be aware when they leave our sites and to read the privacy statements of any other site that collects personally identifiable information.
CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time as we update or expand our Services. If we make material changes, we will post the updated Privacy Policy on this page with a ‘Last Updated’ effective date of the revisions. We encourage you to look for updates and changes to this Privacy Policy by checking this page when you access our Services.
CCPA REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
CCPA Reporting Requirements
(for interim reporting period ending June 30, 2024)
Metric
Total Volume of Requests to Know Received
3
Number of Requests to Know Fulfilled
3
Number of Requests to Know Denied
0
Median Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Know
5
Mean Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Know
13
Total Volume of Requests to Delete Received
11
Number of Requests to Delete Fulfilled
10
Number of Requests to Delete Denied*
1
ㅤNumber of Requests denied as not being verifiable
0
ㅤNumber of Requests denied that were not made by a consumer
0
ㅤNumber of Requests that called for information exempt from deletion
0
ㅤNumber of requests denied on other grounds
1
Median Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Delete
14
Mean Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Delete
14
Number of requests in which deletion was not required in whole, or in part, under each provision in California Civil Code section 1798.145 or 1798.146.
0
Total Volume of Requests to Limit Use of Sensitive Personal Information Received
0
Number of Requests to Limit Use of Sensitive Personal Information Fulfilled
n/a
Number of Requests to Limit Use of Sensitive Personal Information Denied*
n/a
Median Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Limit Use of Sensitive Personal Information
n/a
Mean Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Limit Use of Sensitive Personal Information
n/a
Total Volume of Requests to Correction Received
0
Number of Requests to Correction Fulfilled
n/a
Number of Requests to Correction Denied*
n/a
Median Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Correction
n/a
Mean Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Correction
n/a
Total Volume of Requests to Opt-Out Received
22
Number of Opt-Out Requests Fulfilled**
30
Number of Opt-Out Requests Denied
0
Median Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Opt-Out
1
Mean Number of Days to Respond to Requests to Opt-Out
2
*Denial due to lack of information provided to process the request.
**Number of opt-outs fulfilled may exceed to total volume of opt-out requests receive because Evorra adds users who have requested data to be deleted to our opt-out list, even if the user did not specifically ask to be added to Evorra’s opt-out list.
CONTACT US
If you have any questions about our privacy or security practices, or if you are an Evorra Customer and would like to request access to or correction of your personal information, you can contact us by email at
privacy@evorra.com
or at:
Evorra Inc. Privacy Office
1412 Broadway, 21 FL
New York, New York 10018
Evorra Limited
TC Group, King’s House, 6th FL
9-10 Haymarket
London, SW1Y 4BP, United Kingdom
Sub-policy 6
https://www.sojern.com/privacy/:
Privacy Center
Privacy Policy
Guest Experience Solutions Product Privacy Policy
Online Tracking
Key Terms
GDPR FAQ
Opt Out, Delete, or Export Your Data
Chart of Data Categories
Notice at Collection
Sojern Mission
At Sojern, our mission is to empower travel marketers to connect and engage travelers worldwide; equip them with the best tools and technology; and ensure they are prepared for what lies ahead. We are doing this by building a data-driven performance marketing engine of traveler intent signals across online, mobile, and connected TV channels, and providing AI-powered solutions for destinations to engage and delight guests. In all this, we will maintain your privacy and preserve the ability for you to control your personal information.
Our Key Principles
We are committed to earning your trust by focusing on our key privacy principles:
Transparency: We will be transparent about our data collection, use, and disclosure, and we will clearly communicate that information so you can make informed decisions.
Choice & Control: We will put you in control of your privacy by seeking your consent when we directly interact with you, provide choices when possible, and honor your privacy rights and requests.
Accountability & Respect: We will be accountable for the confidentiality and security of your personal information, respect your local privacy laws, require third-party providers and recipients of your personal information to also do the same, and educate our employees on compliance with privacy policies and laws.
These principles form the foundation of Sojern’s approach to privacy and will continue to shape the way we build our Services.
Explore
Read our
Privacy Policy
and
GES Product Privacy Policy
to learn about how we collect, share, and use personal information about you, and how you can exercise your privacy rights. On this Website, you will find links to more information and controls so you can make the right decisions for you.
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookie Policy
Accept All Cookies
Reject All Cookies
Cookie Settings
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Back
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Back
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 7
https://travelaudience.com/website-privacy-policy/:
Unlocking Data and Media for Destination Success​
Know your visitors.
Nurture them at every stage of their journey.
Unlocking Data and Media for Destination Success​
Know your visitors.
Nurture them at every stage of their journey.
Unlocking Data and Media for Destination Success​
Know your visitors.
Nurture them at every stage of their journey.
1
All-in-one solution providing insights across air, hotel, and sociodemographic data
Attract visitors at any stage of the traveler journey, measure economic impact of your campaigns
Influence travel agents as they search and book across all distribution systems
Start by understanding your Traveler's profile with Navigator 360
Know more
Understand Visitor Trends
Navigator360™
integrates historical and forward-looking hotel, air, and traveler sociodemographic data for a 360° view of the traveler journey.
Gain Behavioral Insights
Get detailed information on booking patterns, travel schedules, and demographics.
Improve Strategic Planning
Use travel data to plan effectively in order to  attract more visitors and increase tourism revenue.
Make DATA-DRIVEN decisions to reach the right traveler at the right time with our advertising solutions​
Engage your traveler across Digital Media channels
Plan your place campaign with our in-house digital marketing experts.
Powered by Amadeus audiences and measured in ROAS based on in-destination arrivals.
Let your destination shine across Programmatic display, video and social media with Amadeus digital advertising.
Let’s craft a winning campaign together!
Influence travel agents at the moment of purchase
✓
Showcase your destination throughout the booking journey and
across all three major GDSs.
✓
Run marketing campaigns backed by
data
and powered by our
in-house technology.
✓
Optimize your media investment to better
reach your advertising goals.
✓
Access our capabilities and
expertise
, available only to the most important travel brands in the industry.
Reach travel sellers ready to book your destination
Get in touch with us for a personalized session​!
Contact us
Your success is our success
Learn how the Netherlands leveraged location-based data to capture demand for sustainable in-bound travel
Capital Region USA generates in-destination visitors with Amadeus’ digital advertising solutions
Learn how Chile’s tourism board finds success reaching travel agents in key markets through multi-GDS advertising
Discover more resources
Travel Insights 2024: Focus on the Americas (September-December)
Read Now
→
Mastering the GDS: A Guide to Effectively Engaging Travel Sellers
Read Now
→
The Hotel Marketing Strategy Toolkit
Read Now
→
Back to top
Take a trip to other Amadeus sites
Corporate site
We’re creating a more connected travel industry, underpinned by sustainability and long-term investor relations.
Careers site
At Amadeus, we’re always on the lookout for talented, passionate people to join our team. Interested?
Sub-policy 8
https://adara.com/privacy-promise/:
Company
Privacy & Guidelines
Adara’s Privacy Promise
Privacy Promise
Opt Out
Brand Safety
Advertiser Guidelines
Subject Access Rights
Do Not Sell My Data
California Consumer Rights
Privacy Promise
Opt Out
Brand Safety
Advertiser Guidelines
Subject Access Rights
Do Not Sell My Data
California Consumer Rights
Updated January 18, 2023
Adara’s Privacy Promise
Adara is committed to your privacy. Adara’s Privacy Promise explains in a transparent way, what data, including personal data, is used in our business, how we process and share it, and your rights in relation to such data.
Adara is a business-to-business company that offers a technology platform (“Adara Platform” or “Platform”) which provides products and services enabling our clients to buy advertising space online and measure and analyze their campaigns.
All data we have access to will be collected, processed and protected consistent with applicable data protection laws, including where applicable the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), and this Privacy Promise.
We may update this Privacy Promise, in order to align with evolving laws and regulations or due to changes in our business and technology. We’ll notify you of any material changes posting them clearly on our website or by other appropriate means. You should consult this page from time to time in order to be aware of any updates.
Who We Are
Adara is a technology company, headquartered in Palo Alto, California, and operating globally, with offices in Chicago, New York, Durham, Dubai, Barcelona, London, Paris, Dublin, Hong Kong, Singapore, Tokyo, and Sydney.
The entity that decides how and for what purposes personal data is processed is Adara, Inc. We have appointed a data protection officer to advise us and respond to data processing related inquiries (please see Section below entitled “
Contacting Us
”).
Adara adheres to the Internet Advertising Bureau Europe’s Good Practice Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising as well as the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance’s principles.
For What Purposes Do We Process Personal Data?
Adara provides digital advertising and analytics services for the benefit of our business customers, giving them the ability to reach and understand Internet users and consumers (like you) who are most likely to be interested in their respective products and services. Adara provides these services to customers such as website operators and mobile application developers (“Partners”). Consumers (like you) also benefit from Adara’s technology by receiving more relevant online marketing content: without our services you would still see ads online, but they would be less relevant to your interests.
Here is a common example of how the Adara Platform can benefit you and our Partners: if you visit an airline or hotel website to book a flight or a hotel room and the airline or hotel website is an Adara Partner, then we will receive your search or booking travel intent about the destination including some related information (dates, class of travel, number of people traveling with you – for a full list see the Section below entitled “
What Personal Data Does Adara Collect?”
). We do not collect your name or your email, or anything that tells us who you are “in the real world.” If we receive any email addresses then they are always in “hashed” (encoded) form so we never hold the actual email address.
Without knowing who you are, our Platform can automatically recognize that a user it has seen before is visiting another Adara Partner site, based on a random unique identifier we call an “Adara Recognized Traveler ID”. Information about travel interests and bookings are linked to the Adara ID and analyzed using proprietary algorithms to understand the user’s likely interests and travel activity.
Our Platform may use automated decision-making tools to seek to understand what type of traveler you are and allocate you a “score” or to a category with other travelers with similar interests, characteristics, and needs. This may enable us to create profiles which allow our Partners to provide more tailored offers or levels of customer service (but not to take decisions that have legal or similar significant effects on any user).
This improves our, and our Partners’ ability, to display relevant advertising to those with an interest in travel. In summary our purposes for processing data are the following:
Online advertising:
We will use the collected data to make decisions or buy, monitor, or report on the delivery of online advertising for our advertiser via ad exchanges. We may also share performance data (i.e. relating to viewability of the ad, clicks and any subsequent purchases) with advertisers and ad agencies. We may overlay third-party data collected from third-party data providers to enhance our decision making. We may also use data to target ads on other devices which we infer belong to the same user.
Measurement and Analytics
: Adara collates and classifies data in our database in aggregated form, which may then be made available via reporting or via the Adara Platform for high level trend analysis. We may also use the data to create analytics about travel industry trends, effectiveness of media, or for content marketing.
Traveler Intelligence:
Adara may share pseudonymous data, always aggregated to not identify one Partner or brand, with our Partners or clients for the purposes of enhancing their CRM for personalization or merchandising optimization.
Data may also be transferred in encrypted format to our vendors and suppliers; including cloud data centers and hosting providers. The data will also be used for specific internal Adara operations including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research, and statistical or survey purposes.
For purposes of GDPR, our legal basis for this data processing is your consent: all users must have notice of and consent to use of cookies or similar technologies by our Partners and to the provision of their data to Adara for processing as explained in this Privacy Promise. Cookie consents can be managed as set out in the Section below entitled “
How to Change Interest-Based Advertising Preferences
”, and other user rights are explained in the “
What Are Your Rights?
” Section. We may also process some data to further our and our Partners’ legitimate interests but only where such interests are not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
What Do We Mean By Personal Data?
“Personal Data” covers more than just personally identifiable information such as name, address, email or phone numbers.
Under the GDPR, personal data is any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person, i.e. it can be a name or address, but also IP addresses and other “unique identifiers” such as device or cookie IDs.
Under the CCPA (implemented in the State of California on January 1, 2020), personal information is information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could be reasonably linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. Concretely, that would include names, email addresses, IP addresses, cookie IDs, device ID’s.
We also refer in this Privacy Promise to “pseudonymous” or “pseudonymized” personal data. We use this to refer to data that cannot be associated with an identifiable person, without the use of additional information which is kept separately. Normally, this means that such identifiable information is not available to Adara (so in Adara’s hands individuals are not identifiable).
What Personal Data Does Adara Collect?
The Adara Platform may collect personal data directly and receives personal data from our Partners that they have collected from their digital properties. The data processed on the Adara Platform (currently and over the last 12 months) is broken down into three trusted data sources about the travelers:
Technical identifiers and hashed or pseudonymized data as follows:
cookie identifier;
hashed email address;
postal address;
mobile device identifier;
hashed CRM identifier;
passenger number record;
approximate location data about the individual (e.g. the country they are located in when accessing an Adara Partner site)
Interests for products and services; and
Measurement statistics on the performances of Adara services.
Note that the Adara Platform cannot identify a user by name or their home address, but instead we try to understand users’ online travel behavior demographic characteristics, such as frequented destinations, type of trip (business vs leisure) and the types of travel, products and services they are interested in). Adara ensures that no information that can identify a user in the real world is stored on the Adara Platform, by requiring all such data to be hashed before it is transmitted to us.
We do not collect or categorize users based upon sensitive data or ‘special categories of data’, such as racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, information about health conditions or treatments or other similar or related information.
Neither do we intentionally collect information from, nor target any services to, or create any categories or profiles of, children under 16 years of age. If you believe that we may have collected information of a child under 16, please contact us as set out in the “
Contacting Us”
Section below.
Business Contact Data
Adara may hold your personal data if you or your employer has a business relationship with us or if you or we are considering entering some form of business relationship.
You could be a client (e.g. an advertiser), a publisher, a data provider or other supplier, and we would need to process your personal data in order to communicate with you, invoice our services, and manage the relationship. The personal data we hold about you refers to your professional life (name, business email address, billing address, office address, business phone numbers, title, qualifications, employer etc.). For potential clients or suppliers, we need to process similar data in order to grow and manage our business and evaluate products and services. In addition, if you visit our website, we may collect data using cookies and other technologies.
We obtain this information directly from you or your employer, or otherwise from exchanging emails or business cards, meeting at industry events, business networking, or at meetings etc. The legal basis for our processing of this data is that we have a legitimate interest in doing so (i.e. in managing and developing our business) for which this data processing is necessary, and which does not have a negative impact on your privacy (as this is professional data only). We may also process this personal data where such processing is necessary for the performance of a contract. We do not have to obtain your consent in order to hold and carry on processing this data. Nevertheless, you can exercise your data subjects’ rights in relation to your personal data (see Section below entitled
“What are your rights?”
).
We store this data for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, pursue legitimate business purposes, enforce our agreements, and comply with applicable laws.
From What Sources Do We Collect Personal Data?
When a user visits one of our Partner’s digital properties they are provided notice of and/or asked to agree to the collection and analysis of information about individual consumer interests by way of “pixels” that we provide to our Partners.
A Partner pixel assigns a unique identifier (a random, unique string of characters) to the user, a “cookie”. A pixel collects and stores information about what the user does on the Partner website or application, and which Partner sites or apps the user visits as well as how the users view and interact with the online ad (for instance the time it is viewable by the user, whether they click on the ad). Similar technologies are used when a user views an email from a Partner with an Adara tag, uses an app with an Adara SDK installed, or sees or interacts with an online advertisement which has been placed through our Platform.
Adara may engage in cross-device data collection and targeting. This means we use third party providers to determine the likelihood that a given user on a desktop browser is the same user on a mobile or other device, and then we link the information we have on their different devices. Adara may also engage in cross-app data collection and targeting.
Where permitted, some Partners use hashed emails as identifiers and Adara may sync hashed emails received from other Partners in order to gain a fuller picture of the user’s travel preferences. We can then build segments, or receive segment data from our Partners and clients, to understand better the data associated with that unique ID. In this case the hashed email is used in a similar way to a cookie ID –Adara does not know the real email address nor can we send emails using it.
The Security of Your Personal Data
Adara cares about your privacy and employs industry standard administrative, physical and technical measures designed to protect your personal data from accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure, or access.
Is Your Personal Data Transferred Internationally?
Adara’s headquarters are in California. All of our data is ultimately sent to the United States, after being collected via our data centers in Amsterdam, Netherlands, Singapore, and South Carolina/Oregon, United States.
As we process data outside the European Economic Area (“EEA” – which in this Privacy Promise includes the UK), we may transfer Personal Data to any other country where our partners, processors or sub-processors maintain facilities.
When our services involve the storage and/or processing of Personal Data outside of the EEA in a jurisdiction such as the US that is not the object of an EU “adequacy” decision or UK adequacy regulations, as applicable, then we only do so on the basis of protective contracts and agreements along with legally required transfer mechanisms, which commit recipients to similar data protection standards as in the EEA, such as the standard contractual clauses (SCC) issued by the European Commission, the UK and/or other responsible Supervisory Authorities.
Where Adara uses this transfer mechanism, Adara ensures, and also requires its data processors to ensure, that sufficient legal and practical safeguards are in place to permit the transfers for the relevant purposes.
In addition, although the EU-US Privacy Shield does not by itself permit international transfers of personal data, Adara also adheres to the Privacy Shield principles of notice, choice, accountability for onward transfer, security, data integrity and purpose limitation, access and recourse, enforcement and liability.
In this Privacy Promise, we have set out the categories of personal data that we may receive in the US, as well as the purposes for which we use personal data. We will not use your personal data for a purpose that is incompatible with the purpose we collected it for or that you later authorized, except in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. Adara maintains reasonable procedures to help ensure that personal data is reliable for its intended use, accurate, complete, and current. We have also set out above the relevant security provisions and access rights available to you.
Who Else May Receive Your Personal Data?
We also engage other companies to provide data processing services including, among other things, data storage, maintenance services and the provision of support services. With these data processors we enter into contracts that require them to adhere to security standards as stringent as ours. A list of our principal data processing partners is set out in the Annex at the end of this Privacy Promise.
Adara is responsible for the processing of personal data it receives, and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. We enter into written agreements with those third-party agents and service providers requiring them to provide the same level of protection and we follow appropriate transfer mechanisms such as the standard contractual clauses and limiting their use of the data to the specified services provided on our behalf. We take reasonable and appropriate steps to ensure that third-party agents and service providers process personal data in accordance with our contracts, data processing addenda and the standard contractual clauses. Adara remains liable if third-party agents that we engage to process such personal data on our behalf do so in a manner inconsistent with our data processing addenda and the standard contractual clauses. Please click
HERE
for more information on our third-party partners.
We may access, preserve, and disclose any data we store in association with you to external parties if we, in good faith, believe doing so is required or appropriate to: (i) comply with law enforcement or national security requests and legal process, such as a court order or subpoena; (ii) protect your, our, or others’ rights, property, or safety; (iii) enforce our policies or contracts; (iv) collect amounts owed to us; or (v) assist with an investigation and prosecution of suspected or actual illegal activity.
If we are involved in a merger, acquisition, financing due diligence, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, purchase or sale of assets, or transition of service to another provider, then data we hold may be sold or transferred as part of such a transaction, as permitted by law and/or contract.
Transfers of personal data out of the EEA are normally based on EU model clauses, otherwise known as Standard Contractual Clauses, issued by the European Commission or other responsible Supervisory Authorities (please see the previous Section). If we receive a valid request, then we may make available a copy of the safeguards applicable to relevant international transfers.
How Long Do We Process Personal Data For?
Adara will never store personal data for longer than necessary for the purpose for which it was collected, and always in accordance with data privacy laws and regulations. We expire cookie data after 13 months for targeting purposes and delete personal data after 24 months for insights and analytics purposes.
For online identifiers like Mobile IDs that remain active indefinitely for the use of the device, Adara dissociates the data after the same data retention periods stated above.
Please note that we may sometimes need to retain data for longer where necessary to comply with our legal obligations and enforce our agreements, in which case we will only process it for those restricted purposes.
What Are Your Rights? (for European Residents)
The GDPR lists various rights in connection with your personal data including:
The right to be informed
The right of access
The right of rectification
The right to erasure
The right to restrict processing
The right to data portability
The right to object to particular processing activities (e.g., marketing or profiling)
In particular, in relation to personal data relating to you that we process:
You may request access to the personal data we hold about you (including categories or scores allocated).
You may be entitled to request that we erase the personal data concerned (or at least have us restrict its processing), subject to any legal requirements that require us to keep it.
Where we are processing personal data relating to you on the basis of your prior consent to that processing, you may withdraw your consent at any time (although this will not affect the legality of any processing based on consent that was carried out before the consent was withdrawn). Normally you will do this through the Partner website, after which we will be notified, or you can contact us directly to withdraw your consent.
In order to process your request we may need to confirm that the identifier we hold matches the information you provide. This request can be made and carried out
HERE
. Alternatively, you can also email
privacy@adara.com
.
We will respond to each request within 30 days.
Please note that we may be required to ask you for further information in order to confirm your identity before we provide or make other changes relating to the personal data requested.
If you have a complaint about any processing of your personal data conducted by us, you can contact us at
privacy@adara.com
or
dpo@adara.com
and we will do our best to resolve the issue. If you believe we have not done so properly, you also have the right to lodge a formal compliant with the relevant Supervisory Authority in your country or to use the mechanisms referred to in the Section below entitled “
Contacting Us
”.
The Data Protection Commission (for European Residents)
As our EU operations are controlled from Ireland, the Data Protection Commission (which is the Supervisory Authority in Ireland) can provide further information about your rights and our obligations in relation to your personal data, as well as deal with any complaints that you have about our processing of your personal data. You can consult their website for more information:
https://www.dataprotection.ie
Our DPO (data protection officer) is registered with the DPC.
New US State Privacy laws
Consumers who are resident in US states such as California, Colorado, Virginia, Connecticut, or Utah may have additional rights under state privacy legislation which defines personal information more broadly, ensures greater transparency and accountability and provides consumers with extended rights as to the collection and use of their personal information
.
Your rights under US State Privacy Laws:
If you are resident in one of the states where specific privacy legislation is in effect then, depending on the particular provisions of applicable local laws, you may have some or all of the following rights:
Right to correction: Consumers have the right to request a business that possesses inaccurate personal information about the consumer to correct such inaccurate personal information, taking into the account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of the personal information.
Right to notice: Businesses must inform consumers at or before the point of collection what categories of personal information will be collected and the purposes for which these categories will be used.
Right to access: Consumers have the right to request that a business disclose the categories of personal information collected; the categories of sources from which personal information is collected; the business or commercial purpose; the categories of third parties with which the business shares personal information; and the specific pieces of personal information the business holds about a consumer. If a business sells personal information or discloses it for business purposes, consumers have the right to request the categories of information so sold or disclosed.
Right to opt out: Consumers have the right—at any time—to direct businesses that sell or share personal information about the consumer to third parties to stop such sales or sharing, known as the right to opt out. If a consumer is a minor, this becomes a right to opt in to the sale or sharing of data (exercised by the minor if the consumer is between 13 and 16 years of age, or by the minor’s parent or guardian if the consumer is under 13 years old). Businesses must wait at least 12 months before asking consumers to opt back in.
Right to request deletion: Consumers also have the right to request deletion of personal information, but only where that information was collected from the consumer. Like the right to erasure under the GDPR, this right is subject to exceptions. For instance, businesses need not delete personal information necessary for detecting security incidents, exercising free speech, protecting or defending against legal claims, or—in what is potentially a broad and likely contentious category—for internal uses reasonably aligned with the consumer’s expectations.
Right to limit use of sensitive information; Consumers have the right to restrict a business’s use of sensitive personal information e.g. to use that is necessary to provide goods or services requested, to certain business purposes, or other legally permitted purposes.
Right to equal services and prices: Businesses must not discriminate against consumers by denying goods or services, charging a different price or rate for goods or services, providing a different level or quality of goods or services, or suggesting that they will do any of these things based upon a consumer’s exercise of any of their legal rights relating to their personal information. Put differently, consumers have a right to equal services and prices.
Exercising your rights under US state laws:
If you want to make a request for exercise of any of the above rights, you (or your authorized agent) can write to
privacy@adara.co
m  and we will respond within 45 days as per the law.
If you make such a request, including through an authorized agent, we reserve the right to verify your identity and the agent’s authorization.
However, we may not be able to respond to your request if it is not permitted or foreseen under applicable law.
(Please note that we do transfer personal information collected through our network of partners to third parties and as such are considered as having disclosed or sold or shared data over the past twelve months. Please see Section 16 below for more information).
What Are Your Rights? (for Brazil Residents)
The Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (LGPD) applies to any resident or any company (located in Brazil or abroad) collecting or/and processing data from Brazilian residents. A data protection authority will soon be established and will offer guidelines and guidance with regards to compliance. Adara collects data based on a valid legal basis such as consent (consentimento) or legitimate interests (interesse legítimo) as per article 7.1 of LGPD. Adara is in the process of appointing a Data Protection Officer (“Encarregado”).
Data subjects have the following rights under the LGPD
confirmation of processing
access
correction
anonymization or deletion
portability
elimination
information
revocation of consent
opposition
rectification
How to Change Interest-Based Advertising Preferences and Your Opt Out Choices
Adara provides several mechanisms for users to change their preferences in relation to Adara’s advertising and analytics services:
using Adara’s mechanism provided
here
on adara.com,
clicking on the relevant link on the advert itself, or
using browser based or mobile based cookie and privacy management settings
In all cases, all these choices will be recorded and/or honored by Adara.
Mobile Opt-Out
To change consents for the collection and use of data for interest-based advertising on your mobile device, you can modify the settings on your mobile device. To reset your mobile advertising ID or to prevent receipt of interest-based ads in mobile apps, please follow your mobile device maker’s most current published instructions, such as the examples linked below (current as of the date of this version of our Privacy Promise):
For Android Devices (version 8.0 and higher): Open the Settings app, Select Google, Select Ads, and enable the “Opt Out of Ads Personalization” setting.
For Apple Devices: Devices with iOS 6 and above use Apple’s Advertising Identifier. To learn more about limiting ad tracking using this identifier, visit the Settings menu on your device as follows: Go to Settings, Select Privacy, Select Advertising, and enable the “Limit Ad Tracking” setting. For more information about different iOS versions, please see:
https://support.apple.com/en-ie/HT202074
.
When you have changed these settings on a device, and when Adara receives this signal, Adara will not use in-app information collected from that device to infer your interests or serve ads to that device that are targeted based on your inferred interests.
Note: The specific settings instructions for each device may differ slightly depending on which version of the operating software you are running.
In addition, as noted above, we participate in the DAA’s Ad Choices program. So, each of our mobile ads includes the AdChoices Icon, on which you can tap to go to a preferences page.
To learn more about how to use platform controls in relation to mobile devices, please visit this link:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice
.
Additional Information for California Consumers
Personal Information Collected in the past 12 months
Category
Examples
Source
Business or Commercial Purpose
Categories of third parties disclosed to
Identifiers
Unique personal identifier
, online identifier, Internet Protocol address (e.g. device and cookie IDs)
From partner websites and apps
From third party data providers
From our clients
Providing and improving our targeted advertising services which include creating and enriching profiles and audiences for our clients
– Our clients
– Our data hosting and storage providers
– Our providers of advertising technology and services such as demand side providers, data management platforms, and ad networks
– Our data processing service providers (for purposes such as analytics, database management, customer support)
– Our other group companies
Commercial information
Records of products or
services
purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies (e.g. sites visited, apps used, searches, views, clicks, and purchases)
As above
As above
As above
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Information regarding your interaction with websites and  applications (e.g. sites visited, apps used, searches, views, clicks, and purchases)
As above
As above
As above
Geolocation Data
Approximate location from information provided by your device (e.g. IP address)
As above
As above
As above
Inference
s
Inference
s drawn from any of the information above to create a profile
As above
As above
As above
Sensitive personal information
Personal information revealing a consumer’s racial or ethnic origin;  information concerning a consumer’s health
Inferred from the above information
As above
As above
*“Personal Information” does not include publicly available information, including information that we have a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public by you; from widely distributed media; or by a person to whom you have disclosed it and not restricted the information to a specific audience.
Personal Information Sold or Shared in the past 12 months
We have sold and/or shared the following categories of Personal information in the past 12 months: (a) Identifiers; (b) Commercial information; (c) Internet or other electronic network activity information; (d) Geolocation Data; and (e) Inferences.
Such information is contained in audiences or profiles that we provide to our clients.
Personal Information disclosed for a business purpose in the past 12 month
s
We have disclosed the following categories of Personal Information for a business purpose in the past 12 months: (a) Identifiers; (b) Commercial information; (c) Internet or other electronic network activity information; (d) Geolocation Data; and (e) Inferences.
These business purposes comprise:
Auditing related to  counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with this specification and other standards.
Helping to ensure security and integrity.
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
Performing services on our behalf, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing financing,  providing analytic services, providing storage, or providing similar services on our behalf.
Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration
.
Undertaking activities to verify or maintain the quality or safety of our services, and to improve, upgrade, or enhance our services.
4.
Statistics of data subject requests for the year 2022 (CCPA)
The number of requests to
know
that the business received: 2, complied with in whole or in part: 2, and denied 0
The number of requests to
delete
that the business received: 1, complied with in whole or in part: 1, and denied 0
The number of requests to
opt out
that the business received: 19,183, complied with in whole or in part: 19,183, and denied 0
The median or mean number of days within which the business substantively responded to requests to know: 20 days, requests to delete: 20 days and requests to opt out: 4 days
Enforcement
Adara is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC). Under certain circumstances, you may invoke binding arbitration.
Contacting Us
The “data controller” for your data is:
Adara, Inc.
2625 Middlefield Road #827
Palo Alto, CA 94303
USA
We have appointed a Data Protection Officer, whose contact details are:
Data Protection Officer
Adara, Inc.
2625 Middlefield Road #827
Palo Alto, CA 94303
Email:
dpo@adara.com
Our EU representative is Adara Media UC, Fumbally Square, Fumbally Lane, Dublin 8, Ireland.
Annex: List of Key Data Processing Partners
Adobe
Amobee
Google DV360
The Trade Desk
LiveRamp
Salesforce
Google Cloud Services
Google Analytics
Google reCAPTCHA
Amazon Cloud Services
Facebook
YouTube
AT&T
Microsoft Curate
Yahoo
Criteo
Zeta Global
StackAdapt
SambaTV
TransUnion
We Care About Your Privacy
We and our
873
partners store and/or access information on a device, such as unique IDs in cookies to process personal data. You may accept or manage your choices by clicking below or at any time in the privacy policy page. These choices will be signaled to our partners and will not affect browsing data.
We and our partners process data to provide:
Use precise geolocation data. Actively scan device characteristics for identification. Store and/or access information on a device. Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development.
List of Partners (vendors)
I Accept
Reject All
Show Purposes
About Your Privacy
We process your data to deliver content or advertisements and measure the delivery of such content or advertisements to extract insights about our website. We share this information with our partners on the basis of consent. You may exercise your right to consent, based on a specific purpose below or at a partner level in the link under each purpose. These choices will be signaled to our vendors participating in the Transparency and Consent Framework.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Store and/or access information on a device
Cookies, device or similar online identifiers (e.g. login-based identifiers, randomly assigned identifiers, network based identifiers) together with other information (e.g. browser type and information, language, screen size, supported technologies etc.) can be stored or read on your device to recognise it each time it connects to an app or to a website, for one or several of the purposes presented here.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development
Use limited data to select advertising
660 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times an ad is presented to you).
View Illustrations
Create profiles for personalised advertising
533 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (such as forms you submit, content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (for example, information from your previous activity on this service and other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (that might include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present advertising that appears more relevant based on your possible interests by this and other entities.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
531 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on your advertising profiles, which can reflect your activity on this service or other websites or apps (like the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects.
View Illustrations
Create profiles to personalise content
234 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (for instance, forms you submit, non-advertising content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (such as your previous activity on this service or other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (which might for example include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present content that appears more relevant based on your possible interests, such as by adapting the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised content
208 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on your content personalisation profiles, which can reflect your activity on this or other services (for instance, the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects, such as by adapting the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find (non-advertising) content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Measure advertising performance
766 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which advertising is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine how well an advert has worked for you or other users and whether the goals of the advertising were reached. For instance, whether you saw an ad, whether you clicked on it, whether it led you to buy a product or visit a website, etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of advertising campaigns.
View Illustrations
Measure content performance
379 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which content is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine whether the (non-advertising) content e.g. reached its intended audience and matched your interests. For instance, whether you read an article, watch a video, listen to a podcast or look at a product description, how long you spent on this service and the web pages you visit etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of (non-advertising) content that is shown to you.
View Illustrations
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
483 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Reports can be generated based on the combination of data sets (like user profiles, statistics, market research, analytics data) regarding your interactions and those of other users with advertising or (non-advertising) content to identify common characteristics (for instance, to determine which target audiences are more receptive to an ad campaign or to certain contents).
View Illustrations
Develop and improve services
571 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service, such as your interaction with ads or content, can be very helpful to improve products and services and to build new products and services based on user interactions, the type of audience, etc. This specific purpose does not include the development or improvement of user profiles and identifiers.
View Illustrations
Use limited data to select content
144 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type, or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times a video or an article is presented to you).
View Illustrations
List of IAB Vendors‎
Use precise geolocation data
With your acceptance, your precise location (within a radius of less than 500 metres) may be used in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Actively scan device characteristics for identification
With your acceptance, certain characteristics specific to your device might be requested and used to distinguish it from other devices (such as the installed fonts or plugins, the resolution of your screen) in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your data can be used to monitor for and prevent unusual and possibly fraudulent activity (for example, regarding advertising, ad clicks by bots), and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely. It can also be used to correct any problems you, the publisher or the advertiser may encounter in the delivery of content and ads and in your interaction with them.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Certain information (like an IP address or device capabilities) is used to ensure the technical compatibility of the content or advertising, and to facilitate the transmission of the content or ad to your device.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Information about your activity on this service may be matched and combined with other information relating to you and originating from various sources (for instance your activity on a separate online service, your use of a loyalty card in-store, or your answers to a survey), in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
In support of the purposes explained in this notice, your device might be considered as likely linked to other devices that belong to you or your household (for instance because you are logged in to the same service on both your phone and your computer, or because you may use the same Internet connection on both devices).
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends when accessing the Internet (for instance, the IP address of your Internet connection or the type of browser you are using) in support of the purposes exposed in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 9
https://www.forter.com/privacy-policy/:
Website Privacy Policy
Last updated:
November 2024
Forter, Ltd. and its affiliates (collectively, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”, or “
Forter
”) are committed to protecting your privacy. This Privacy Policy describes what Personal Data (as defined below) we collect from you when you visit
www.forter.com
(the “
Website
”) or otherwise interact with us, how we use your Personal Data, who we share it with, certain rights you may have with respect to your Personal Data, and how to contact us about our privacy practices.
For purposes of applicable EU data protection laws, Forter Ltd and each of its affiliates may each be a data controller of any Personal Data we collect from you. For purposes of the CCPA, Forter and its affiliates may each act as a ‘Business’ (as defined in the CCPA) with respect to your Personal Data. Additional details about each of these entities can be found at the end of this Privacy Policy.
Overview
This section provides a summary of the information provided in our Privacy Policy, a full version of which can be found below. The full version of our Privacy Policy contains more detailed information regarding our privacy practices.
If you have any questions or concerns about our Privacy Policy or our privacy practices, please contact us at
privacy@forter.com
.
What type of information we collect
We collect Personal Data and Anonymous Data from you when you visit our Website and when you otherwise interact with us, for example, when you send us information or communications or register for white papers, web seminars, and other events hosted by us, or sign up for our newsletters or other marketing materials. We also collect Personal Data and Anonymous Data through the use of cookies. For more information regarding our use of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
“
Personal Data
” means any data that identifies you or that allows someone to identify you, including your name, address, telephone number, email address, and IP address, as well as other information about you that is associated with or linked to any of the foregoing data.
“
Anonymous Data
” means data that is not associated with or linked to your Personal Data. Anonymous Data does not permit the identification of you or other individuals.
We do not collect any “special categories” of Personal Data about you (this includes details about your race or ethnicity, religious or philosophical beliefs, sex life, sexual orientation, political opinions, trade union membership, or information about your health or genetic or biometric data).
How we use collected information
We collect and use your Personal Data to administer our Website and our business, improve our Website, products and services, respond to your inquiries, manage our relationship with you, for compliance purposes, and to deliver relevant website content and advertisements to you, as further detailed in this Privacy Policy.
We rely on various legal bases under applicable data protection laws to process your personal data, including our legitimate interests, contractual necessity and as required by applicable law.
With whom we share information
We do not rent, sell, or share your Personal Data with third parties, other than with select trusted third party service providers, to comply with applicable law or the request of a governmental entity, in connection with certain corporate transactions, and in connection with litigation and compliance monitoring, as further detailed in this Privacy Policy.
How we safeguard your information
Forter is committed to protecting your Personal Data. We employ industry best practices and regularly commission third party audits and certifications to ensure the security and confidentiality of your Personal Data and to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized access and improper use.
Full Website Privacy Policy
Introduction
This Privacy Policy describes what Personal Data Forter collects from you when you use our Website or otherwise interact with us, how we use your Personal Data, who we share it with, how we safeguard your Personal Data, certain rights you may have with respect to your Personal Data, and how to contact us about our privacy practices.
Please read this Privacy Policy carefully.
What type of information we collect
We collect certain information from you when you use our Website or otherwise interact with us, as further described below. We also collect certain information about you through our use of cookies and other technologies, as further described below and in our
Cookie Policy
. This information includes both your Personal Data and Anonymous Data.
Personal Data You Provide to Us.
We collect Personal Data from you when you visit our Website or otherwise interact with us, for example when you send us information or communications or register for white papers, web seminars, and other events hosted by us, or sign up for our newsletters or other marketing materials. This information may include your first and last name, phone number, email and mailing addresses, professional title and company name. If you provide us feedback on our Website or contact us, or submit a response to an employment opportunity posted on our Website, we will collect your name and email address, as well as any other information included in your email or other correspondence with us.
Personal Data Collected Via Cookies and other Technologies.
Information regarding how you access and use our Website (e.g., browser type, access times, and Internet Protocol (IP) address) and your hardware and software is automatically collected through our use of cookies (a small text file placed on your hard drive) or other technologies and tools. This information is used to improve our Website, make our products and services more useful to you, and for other business purposes. Please see our
Cookie Policy
for more information regarding our use of cookies.
How we use your information
We use your Personal Data collected through your use of our Website or otherwise in your interactions with us for the following purposes.  The legal basis on which we rely to use your Personal Data for such purposes is also set out below.
In addition to the below, we use Zoom’s AI Companion tool for recording, transcription, and summarization of certain meetings and telephone calls to enhance productivity and collaboration. The AI Companion processes information shared during calls, including personal data and other confidential or sensitive data, to provide transcripts and summaries for meeting participants.
The data collected through this tool will be used solely for internal training, to enhance productivity and collaboration across our business, and for purposes related to the relevant meeting or call, such as documentation and follow-up. Recordings and transcriptions are securely stored and retained only as long as necessary for these purposes. Additionally, if you provide us with your phone number, we may use it to send you text messages. We will not share or sell your phone number with other third parties, and you can ask us to stop texting you at any point by replying ‘STOP’’.
Participants will be notified and given an opportunity to provide consent prior to recording. If consent is not provided the AI Companion will not be used during the meeting. If you have any questions about how your data is processed during these activities, please contact us at
privacy@forter.com
.
“
Contact Information
” includes your name, phone number, email and mailing address, professional title and company name.
“
Usage Data
” includes information regarding time spent on our Website, pages visited, links clicked, language preferences, and the pages that led or referred you to our Website.
“
Browser and Device Data
” includes your IP address, device type, browser type, geographic location and information about your operating system and language preferences.
“
Marketing Information
” includes Contact Information and your communication preferences.
Purpose/Activity
Type of data
Legal basis
To administer and protect our business and our Website (including troubleshooting, data
analysis, testing, system maintenance, support, reporting and hosting of data)
Contact Information
Browser and Device Data
Performance of a contract with you
Necessary for our legitimate interests
Necessary to comply with a legal obligation
To manage our relationship with you
Contact Information
Marketing Information
Performance of a contract with you
Necessary to comply with a legal obligation
Necessary for our legitimate interests
To provide, maintain and improve our products and services
Contact Information
Browser and Device Data
Usage Data
Performance of a contract with you
Necessary for our legitimate interests
To deliver relevant Website content and advertisements to you and measure and understand the effectiveness of the advertising we serve to you
Contact Information
Browser and Device Data
Usage Data
Marketing Information
Necessary for our legitimate interests
To monitor and analyze trends, usage and activities on our Website and improve our Website, products and services and customer
relationships and experiences
Contact Information
Browser and Device Data
Usage Data
Necessary for our legitimate interests
To make suggestions and recommendations to you about products or services that may be of interest to you
Contact Information
Browser and Device Data
Usage Data
Necessary for our legitimate interests
Where required, we will ask for your explicit consent
For compliance purposes, including to respond to requests from law enforcement and other governmental entities, and in connection with litigation management and conducting internal audits and investigations
Contact Information
Necessary for our legitimate interest
Necessary to comply with a legal obligation
To conduct due diligence activities in connection with an actual or prospective corporate transaction
Contact Information
Necessary for our legitimate interest
Marketing
We may send you direct marketing communications to keep you informed of our products and services in which you might be interested. Where required under applicable law, we will only send such communications where we have obtained your prior consent, or based on our legitimate business interests where we have an existing relationship with you and we wish to contact you about similar products or services in which you may be interested. You may opt-in to receive marketing materials from us by ticking the applicable marketing communication preference boxes displayed on our Website.
When you receive marketing communications from us, you will have the opportunity to opt-out by following the unsubscribe instructions provided in the email you receive from us or by contacting us
here
.
Creation of Anonymous Data
We may create Anonymous Data from your Personal Data by excluding information (such as your name) that makes the data personally identifiable to you. We use this Anonymous Data to analyze request and usage patterns and to improve our Website and our products and services. We reserve the right to use and disclose Anonymous Data to third parties in our discretion.
Who we share your information with
We do not rent, sell or share your Personal Data with third parties, except as described in this Privacy Policy.
In order to administer our business and our Website and provide you with our products and services, we may share your Personal Data between and among our affiliates. We may also share your Personal Data with trusted third party service providers that we have engaged to assist us with our business operations (e.g. data hosting providers), as necessary for such third parties to provide services to us. Prior to sharing your Personal Data with our third party service providers, we ensure that such third parties commit to protecting the security and confidentiality of your Personal Data.
We may also disclose your Personal Data if we believe disclosure of your Personal Data is necessary to: (i) comply with applicable law or a request from a court, regulator, or other governmental entity; (ii) enforce our contractual rights and our policies, including in connection with investigations of potential violations thereof; (iii) investigate, detect, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities or other wrongdoing, including suspected fraud or security issues; (iv) establish or exercise our rights to defend against legal claims; (v) to protect the rights, privacy, property or safety us, users of our Website or other third parties; and (vi) to enforce our intellectual property or other legal rights.
Additionally, we may share your Personal Data with third parties in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction involving Forter, such as a merger, acquisition, divestiture, reorganization, financing or sale of our assets, as well as in connection with an insolvency, bankruptcy or similar proceeding involving us. Any entity that acquires us (in whole or in part) shall be permitted to continue to use your Personal Data as set forth in this Privacy Policy, but shall assume our rights and obligations with respect to your Personal Data, as described in this Privacy Policy.
The table below describes the categories of Personal Data we have collected from you in the past twelve months and the categories of third parties to whom we disclose such Personal Data for a business purpose.
Categories of Personal Data Collected
Categories of Third Parties to Whom the Business Discloses Personal Information
Identifiers
Affiliates
Third Party Service Providers
Marketing Information
Affiliates
Third Party Service Providers
Internet or Electronic Network Activity Information
Affiliates
Third Party Service Providers
Transfer of your information
We may transfer your Personal Data outside of your country of residence. Where we do so, we comply with applicable laws in relation to such transfer.
To the extent your Personal Data is subject to the GDPR and we transfer your Personal Data outside the EEA, such transfer will only be made in accordance with the GDPR and other applicable EU privacy laws.
For further information about the safeguards and derogations used for such transfers of your Personal Data, please contact
privacy@forter.com
.
How we safeguard your information
We are committed to protecting the information you entrust to us and take great care in implementing and maintaining the security of our Website and safeguarding your Personal Data. We employ industry best practices and regularly commission third party audits and certifications to ensure the security and confidentiality of your Personal Data and to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized access and improper use. Although we take reasonable steps to safeguard your Personal Data, unfortunately, the transmission of information and data via the Internet is not completely secure, and we cannot guarantee the security of any information or data transmitted to or through our Website. Any transmission of information or data by you to or through our Website is at your sole risk.
We have put in place procedures to deal with any suspected personal information breach and will notify you and any applicable regulator of a breach where we are legally required to do so.
How long we retain your information
We will retain your Personal Data only for as long as necessary for the purposes for which it was collected, unless a longer retention period is required by applicable law. For further information about how long we keep your Personal Data, please contact
privacy@forter.com
.
Third-party websites collection of information
Our Website may contain links to other websites provided by third parties not under our control or affiliated with us. Please be aware that this Privacy Policy applies only to the use and disclosure of information you share with us through our Website or when you otherwise interact with us, and that third parties may have different rules regarding their handling of your Personal Data.
We are not responsible for any information you provide to a third party, including through any third party website linked on our Website.
Your rights with respect to you to your information
Individuals located in certain countries have certain statutory rights with respect to their Personal Data
If you are located in the EEA, the UK or Switzerland, you have certain rights under the General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) (the “
GDPR
”), including the right to:
Access the Personal Data we hold about you;
Correct any Personal Data we hold about you that may be inaccurate;
Request that we delete Personal Data we hold about you, subject to certain limitations;
In certain circumstances, restrict or object to us processing your Personal Data;
Transfer the Personal Data we hold about you to another organization (subject to certain conditions); and
Withdraw your consent to us processing your Personal Data, where you previously consented to us processing your Personal Data but you no longer wish for us to do so
If you are a California resident, you have certain rights under the California Consumer Protection Act 2018 (California Civil Code §§ 1798.100 to 1798.199) (the “
CCPA
”), including the right to:
Request certain information about your Personal Data, including the categories of Personal Data we hold about you, the categories of sources of Personal Data we collected about you, the business or commercial purpose for which we collected your Personal Data, the categories of third parties with whom we have shared your Personal Data, and the specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you;
Request that we delete Personal Data we hold about you, subject to certain limitations;
Opt out of any sale or sharing of your Personal Data (note that we do not rent, sell or share your Personal Data except as stated in this Privacy Policy);
In some cases, claim compensation for damage caused by our breach of the CCPA; and
Not be discriminated against for exercising any of these rights
If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us at
privacy@forter.com
. If you are located in the EEA or Switzerland you can also contact us through our EU representative Prighter, at the following website:
https://prighter.com/q/12970917510
. We will respond within the timeframes required under applicable law. When handling your request, we may need to request additional information from you (which may include Personal Data) to help us confirm your identity. This is a security measure to ensure that your Personal Data is not disclosed to any person who has no right to receive it. We may also contact you to ask you for further information in relation to your request to speed up our response. Please note that if you do not provide us with this additional information, we may be unable to process your request.
Minors
Our Website is intended for individuals who are at least 16 years of age. We do not knowingly encourage or solicit visitors to our Website who are under the age of 16 or knowingly collect any Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. In the event that we become aware that an individual under the age of 16 has shared any Personal Data with us, we will delete such information.
If you have any reason to believe that an individual under the age of 16 has shared any Personal Data with us, please contact us at
privacy@forter.com
.
Complaints
Individuals located in certain countries may have the right to lodge a complaint with regards to how we process your Personal Data with your local data protection authority (in the United Kingdom, this is the Information Commissioner’s Office, which can be contacted in accordance with the means specified at
https://ico.org.uk/global/contact-us
)
If you are a California resident, you can lodge a complaint with the California Attorney General’s Office.
Updates or amendments to the Privacy Policy
We reserve the right to amend this Privacy Policy from time to time, in our sole discretion. If we decide to change this Privacy Policy, we will post these changes so our users are always aware of what information we collect, how we use it, and under what circumstances we disclose it. The most current version of this Privacy Policy will always appear on our Website.
If at any point we decide to collect or use your Personal Data in a manner different from that stated in this Privacy Policy at the time it was collected, we will notify applicable individuals. We will use your Personal Data only in accordance with the Privacy Policy under which the information was collected.
How to contact us
If you have any questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy or our privacy practices, please contact us as
privacy@forter.com
.
Details of Forter Ltd. and its affiliates:
Forter Ltd: Derech Menachem Begin 156 Tel Aviv, Israel 6492108 (Company Number 514886969)
Forter, Inc: 575 Fifth Ave., New York, NY 10017
Forter Solutions UK Ltd: 30 Old Bailey London EC4M 7AU (Companies House Registration No. 12136011)
Forter Pte Ltd: 135 Cecil St. #10-01, MYP Plaza, Singapore (069536)
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookies Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label